
Nomura System Corporation Co Ltd (3940.T)  Company Profile | Reuters.com


























































X



Edition:

United States


















Africa
América Latina


عربي
Argentina


Brasil
Canada


中国
Deutschland


España
France


India
Italia


日本
México


РОССИЯ
United Kingdom

United States
















Profile: Nomura System Corporation Co Ltd (3940.T)





Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerTechnologyIT Services & Consulting












                
                        Overview
                    



                
                        News
                    



                
                        Key Developments
                    



                
                        People
                    



                
                        Charts
                    



                
                        Financials
                    



                
                        Analysts
                    



                    
                            Research
                        



                    
                            Pulse
                        










				3940.T on Tokyo Stock Exchange


				1,506JPY
3 Aug 2017





				    Change	(% chg)


		    
						    ¥42


					            (+2.87%)
					        






Prev Close

¥1,464


Open

¥1,485




Day's High

¥1,510


Day's Low

¥1,450




Volume

32,500


Avg. Vol

156,377




52-wk High

¥2,590


52-wk Low

¥354












					Full Description



		Nomura System Corporation Co, Ltd. is a Japan-based company engaged in the enterprise resource planning (ERP) solution business, including the Germany-based company SAP SE's product SAP ERP’s introduction consulting business and SAP ERP’s maintenance business. The Company principally operates its business through two services. The Function Implement service (FIS) is involved in provision of SAP ERP's consulting services for partner companies. The Prime service is mainly involved in provision of SAP ERP product’s one-stop service, from introduction’s planning to operational stage. The service is mainly provided by the Company’s employees and provided directly to end users. The Company is also involved in the Website’s system development consulting business and information consulting business.
» Full Overview of 3940.T







					Company Address



Nomura System Corporation Co Ltd
7FAsahi Seimei Ebisu Bldg., 1-3-1,SHIBUYA-KU   TKY   150-0013
P: +813.57933330F: +813.57933331







					Company Web Links



Home Page








					Officers & Directors






Name
Compensation




							 Shigeru Ariga

--




							 Yasuo Nemoto

--




							 Katsuhisa Kato

--




							 Yoshimitsu Nomura

--




							 Tsutomu Uchiyama

--




» More Officers & Directors





					Nomura System Corporation Co Ltd News




» More 3940.T  News
















Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerTechnologyIT Services & Consulting






















Nomura System Corporation Co, Ltd. (3940) / IR Information









































































Nomura System Corporation Co, Ltd.
Nomura System Corporation is a professional services company, enhancing
the strengths of client companies by the use of SAP products.
Services are structured to support improvements and innovation
for the businesss processes and information systems that form the foundation
for client companies' business operation.



Securities Code
3940


Industrial Classification
Telecommunication


Stock Market
JASDAQ


URL
Japanese : https://www.nomura-system.co.jp/











Financial Data


FY12/2017

Non-consolidated Financial Results for the First Quarter of 2017 (Three Months Ended March 31, 2017)
 (41KB)












Copyright(C)2002-2017 ACE CONSULTING CO., LTD.














Domestic Bases & Subsidiary | Nomura Micro Science Co.,Ltd.























Site Map
Japanese




Middle

Large



































 > Corporate Profile > Domestic Bases & Subsidiary
Domestic Bases & Subsidiary



Domestic Bases


Head Office
                    


Head Office
2-9-8, Okata, Atsugi-shi, Kanagawa-ken 243-0021, Japan
                                 TEL / +81-46-228-3946　FAX / +81-46-227-5990
                            


Kitakami Resident Office
Kyatorakuto Kitakami 1-B, 1-1-3, Nakano-cho, Kitakami-shi, Iwate-ken 024-0024, Japan
                                 TEL / +81-197-64-6298　FAX / +81-197-64-6301
                            


Sendai District Office
Takanoboru #22 Bldg. #502, 3-4-18, Tsutsujigaoka, Miyagino-ku, Sendai-shi, Miyagi-ken 983-0852, Japan
                                 TEL / +81-22-293-6081　FAX / +81-22-293-6232
                            


Saitama Resident Office
ntel-U Bldg. 2F, 1-2-8, Bessho, Minami-ku, Saitama-shi, Saitama-ken 336-0021, Japan
                                 TEL / +81-48-838-8651　FAX / +81-48-838-8681
                            


Eastern Japan Sales Office
2-9-12, Okata, Atsugi-shi, Kanagawa-ken 243-0021, Japan
                                 TEL / +81-46-228-3944　FAX / +81-46-228-3506
                            


Kakegawa Resident Office
1958, Osaka, Kakegawa-shi, Shizuoka-ken 437-1421, Japan
                                 TEL / +81-537-63-3680　FAX / +81-537-63-3681
                            


Nagoya District Office
Nagoya Central Inter Bldg. 5F, 270, Takaragaoka, Meito-ku, Nagoya-shi, Aichi-ken 465-0043, Japan
                                 TEL / +81-52-769-3850　FAX / +81-52-769-3852
                            


Keiji Resident Office
Fuyo Bldg. 7F, 17-12, Kinoshita-cho, Otsu-shi, Shiga-ken 520-0812, Japan
                                 TEL / +81-77-527-5671　FAX / +81-77-528-6062
                            


Western Japan Sales Office
3-18-4, Tarumi-cho, Suita-shi, Osaka-fu 564-0062, Japan
                                 TEL / +81-6-6384-1186　FAX / +81-6-6384-8654
                            


Fukuyama District Office
Frontier Kasuga 1F, 2-1-28, Kasuga-cho, Fukuyama-shi, Hiroshima-ken 721-0907, Japan
                                 TEL / +81-84-940-6911　FAX / +81-84-940-6912
                            


Kan-onji District Office
SANKYO PLAZAⅠ 1F #1, 97-1, Nagareoka-cho, Kan-onji-shi, Kagawa-ken 768-0014, Japan
                                 TEL / +81-875-24-3373　FAX / +81-875-24-3382
                            


Yamaguchi Resident Office
2-3-3,Ekiminami,Kudamatsu-shi,Yamaguchi-Ken 744-0007,Japan
                                 TEL / +81-833-44-0770　FAX / +81-833-44-0780
                            


Kyushu Sales Office
5-13-18, Kawarada, Onojo-shi, Fukuoka-ken 816-0932, Japan
                                 TEL / +81-92-589-0600　FAX / +81-92-589-06055
                            


Oita Resident Office
Mount Bell Adachi #101, 5461-1, Matsuoka. Oita-shi, Oita-ken 870-0125, Japan
                                 TEL / +81-97-525-9650　FAX / +81-97-525-9655
                            


Nagasaki Resident Office
721-3, Sanjo-cho, Omura-shi, Nagasaki-ken 856-0031, Japan
                                 TEL / +81-957-48-5085　FAX / +81-957-48-5086
                            


Miyazaki Resident Office
2-38-1, Shode , Kiyotake-cho, Miyazaki-shi, Miyazaki-ken 889-1603, Japan
                                 TEL / +81-985-55-6855　FAX / +81-985-55-6857
                            


Kumamoto Resident Office
162-8, Tsukure, Kikuyo-machi, Kikuchi-gun, Kumamoto-ken, 869-1101, Japan
                                 TEL +81-96-285-4271　FAX +81-96-285-4271
                        



Subsidiaries


AGRU PLASTICS Co., Ltd.
                    





AGRU PLASTICS Co., Ltd.
                                http://www.agru-pla.co.jp




Capital
100 million yen


Shareholders
Nomura Micro Science Co., Ltd. (Solely owned)


President
Takahide Miyake


Address
2-4-5, Okata, Atsugi-shi, Kanagawa-ken
                                             TEL / +81-46-227-0653
                                            FAX / +81-46-228-5686
                                        


Business activities
Stocking and distributing of plastic products.
                                    






 


Nomura Micro Science Korea Co., Ltd.
                    







Nomura Micro Science Korea Co., Ltd.
                                http://www.nomura-nmsk.co.kr/




Capital
3,849.840 million won


Shareholders
Nomura Micro Science Co., Ltd. (Solely owned)


Chairman
Toyosaku Senda


President
Jong san Kim


Address
Ace B/D 5F, Seongnamdaero 779beon-gil 20, Bundang-ku, Seongnam-City, Gyeonggi-do, Korea
                                             TEL / +82-31-708-3946
                                            FAX / +82-31-708-2848
                                        


Business activities
Maintenance of ultra- pure water.
                                            Manufacture and sales of ultra-pure water and general water treatment system.
                                            Import and export of above system parts and ion exchange resins.
                                            System development related to ultra-pure water system and wastewater reclamation system.
                                            Development, planning, evaluation, sales etc. of new products in ultra-pure water system, wastewater reclamation system and their peripheral area.
                                        







 


Nomura Micro Science Engineering Co., Ltd.
                    







Nomura Micro Science Engineering Co., Ltd.



Capital
75 million NT$


Shareholders
Nomura Micro Science Co., Ltd. (Solely owned)


President
Chang Ming Chih


Address
6F, No.417, Sec. 2, Gongdao 5 th Rd., East Dist., Hsinchu City 30069, Taiwan
                                             TEL / +886-3-5718111
                                             FAX / +886-3-5716111
                                        


Business activities
Design, manufacture, sales and maintenance of pure water producing unit and sales of related consumables.
                                    






 


Shanghai Nomura Engineering Co., Ltd.
                    








                                Shanghai Nomura Engineering Co., Ltd.
                            



Capital
5.10 million US$


Shareholders
Nomura Micro Science Co., Ltd. (Solely owned)


President
Chang Ming Chih


General Manager
Yoshinari Inoue


Address
Room 101-106, D Asset, No 50, 2080 Lian hua Rd, Min hang District, Shanghai P.R.China
                                             TEL / 86-21-6262-5622
                                             FAX / 86-21-6262-5619
                                        


Business activities
Supply and maintenance of equipment and consumables for ultra pure water disposal systems and waste water disposal system related systems.










Qiandongnan Kaichuang Water Resource Environmental Technology Co.,LTD.



Capital
45 million RMB


President
Naomichi Yonekawa


General Manager
Tsuyoshi Takamori


Address
B-35 Miaodongfengqingyuan, Kaili City, Guizhou Province, China
                                        


Business activities
Design, construction, and operation management of water purifying plant.
                                            Design, construction, and operation management of wastewater treatment plant.
                                            And technical guidance, consulting services of technology/information related to the above business activities.










Nomura Micro Science USA Ltd., Co



Capital
1,200,000 US$


Shareholders
Nomura Micro Science Co., Ltd. (Solely owned)


President
Katsuji Nishie


Address
1006E. YAGER LN. SUITE B203 AUSTIN, TEXAS 78753 U.S.A.
                                             TEL / +1-512-873-0084
                                             FAX / +1-512-873-2388
                                        


Business activities
Sales and import of ultra-pure water systems and wastewater treatment systems.
                                             Supply and maintenance of machine parts and consumables related to the above systems.













Corporate Profile

Overview
Domestic Bases & Subsidiary
Company History
Origin of NMS Logo
Message from the President
Comprehensive Ability as a Company
Environmental Practice
Effort for Quality/Safety










  3940:Tokyo Stock Quote - Nomura System Corp Co Ltd - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Nomura System Corp Co Ltd   3940:JP   Tokyo        1,506.0JPY   42.0   2.87%     As of 2:00 AM EDT 8/3/2017     Open   1,485.0    Day Range   1,450.0 - 1,510.0    Volume   32,500    Previous Close   1,464.0    52Wk Range   342.0 - 2,590.0                   


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Open   1,485.0    Day Range   1,450.0 - 1,510.0    Volume   32,500    Previous Close   1,464.0    52Wk Range   342.0 - 2,590.0    YTD Return   187.77%    Current P/E Ratio (TTM)   35.90    Earnings per Share (JPY) (TTM)   41.9    Market Cap (b JPY)   8.398    Shares Outstanding  (m)   5.576    Price/Sales (TTM)   2.86    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   1.13%        Sector Information Technology   % Price Change -0.22%     Industry Software & Services   % Price Change +0.03%                    Related Videos  There are currently no related videos for this ticker. Please check back later.    Company News Press Releases   There are currently no news stories for this ticker. Please check back later.    There are currently no press releases for this ticker. Please check back later.      Profile   Nomura System Corporation,Ltd. provides SAP ERP Solution consulting and implementation services. The Company's line of business also includes providing computer programming services.    Address  1-3-1 EbisuShibuya-Ku, 150-0013Japan   Phone  81-3-5793-3330   Website   www.nomura-system.co.jp/     Executives Board Members    Yoshimitsu Nomura  Representative Director    Yasuo Nemoto  Managing Director    Shigeru Ariga  Managing Director    Tsutomu Yoshida  Director    Tsutomu Uchiyama  Director     Show More         




Careers, Nomura Americas
















Experienced Professionals


Students & Graduates













Make an impression
We are looking for the next generation of entrepreneurs and leaders to shape our future








About Nomura
Careers in global investment banking

Make an impression
At Nomura you will discover a unique spirit and proud heritage. Since 1925, Nomura has built on a commitment to deliver unique value to clients by connecting markets East & West. We continue to service our clients in a differentiated way, providing creative and entrepreneurial solutions.
If you are keen to be a part of a highly nimble and diverse workforce that offers opportunities for you to build a long term career, then come and discover more about Nomura. This could be a perfect fit for you.
Since our founding we have accumulated an unparalled depth and breadth of experience throughout Asia and the rest of the world. We are a highly integrated global network of 27,000 people in 30 countries across our retail, asset management and wholesale (Global Markets and Investment Banking) divisions.
Help us realize our strategy and ambition by joining us in one of our three wholesale businesses:

Global Markets
Investment Banking
Corporate Infrastructure (ie, Operations, Technology and Finance)

Americas
Our history in the US dates back to 1927 when Nomura became a registered member of the New York Stock Exchange. Much of our early work concentrated on providing clients with a unique view of, and access to, Asian markets.
Nomura has a built a strong capital position in the Americas with product knowledge in Fixed Income, Equities, Investment Banking and Asset Management. While our regional headquarters are in New York, we also have offices in Atlanta, Boston, Chicago, Houston, San Francisco, Washington D.C., Toronto, Bermuda, and São Paulo.





Koji NagaiGroup CEO




The Nomura Brand Story




Diversity & corporate citizenship



Nomura History







Nomura Offices


































































































Message from the Group CEO

Supporting Japan's Future
Our home market of Japan is on the verge of significant change. Since the new government came to power in 2012, we have seen early signs of an economic recovery. To build on this momentum, we need to look hard at what the country requires and how we can contribute.
Given that Japan is the world's largest creditor nation and has the world's fastest aging population, one area that requires attention is the creation of a new social framework. At the same time, we need to revise the structure of our financial system. For Japan to grow sustainably into the future, the capital markets will have to play a more prominent role. Indeed, Japan's approximately ¥1,500 trillion in personal financial assets holds the key to the country's future growth. Nomura aims to support this growth by facilitating the flow of funds throughout the economy.
Connecting Markets East & West
Asia is expected to account for half of the world's GDP by 2050 and will no doubt remain the growth engine of the global economy over the coming years. However, for the region to realize its full potential, Asian countries must finance the large-scale infrastructure projects required to underpin economic growth. Japan can play a leading role here, growing together with the rest of Asia by putting its financial assets to work across the region. With Asia as our home market, this is an area in which Nomura has a distinct competitive advantage.
As economies around the world mature and become increasingly global, companies and investors in the West are looking East for growth opportunities. As the only Japanese financial institution with a truly global network, Nomura is well placed to connect markets in the East and the West by leveraging our franchise to provide liquidity in the world's capital markets. By meeting the needs of our global client base and expanding our business, we can contribute to economic growth and social development.
In doing so, we aim to win the trust of our clients and society as we work towards being Asia's global investment bank.

×


Nomura History



×


Diversity & corporate citizenship

Corporate citizenship
Investing in the communities where we operate is an integral part of our business model and our culture. Every day we think creatively for our clients and our capacity for innovation also gives us the ability to drive societal change – that is at the heart of our award-winning Community Affairs program.
In all our work with local communities, our approach is underpinned by a desire to make life better for future generations. In practice, this means investing in young people and leveling the playing field, so that everyone has a better chance to grow and succeed, regardless of their socioeconomic background.
Nomura is committed to contributing to sustainable development through our core business and corporate activities in order to make the world a better place for future generations.
With the support of Nomura employees’ as volunteers, initiatives and fund raising events have included the Power Lunch mentoring and literacy program, Parkinson's Unity Walk, MuckFest MS, Dress for Success and Make-A-Wish Family day amongst other monthly volunteering programs organised.
Diversity and inclusion
We believe that attracting, developing and retaining the most talented people with the broadest experiences positively affects the bottom line. By fostering an inclusive culture, we are working to create an organization where impressive people can build their careers. Our people should be valued for the work they do and be respected for their contributions.
One of the ways we encourage people to connect with others is through our employee networks, Women in Nomura (WIN), LGBT and Employee Life and Families (ELF). Through formal and informal events, participants are able to exchange ideas and receive support on both career and family related topics. By supporting the development of employee networks and communities of interest, we are breaking down silos and strengthening relationships across the globe.

×




Our Business
Built to value ideas


Intellectual Capital in Action 
Get a unique perspective from our international experts – Connecting Markets East & West.









We have a client-centric model and continue to make significant enhancements to our investment banking platform, global distribution, structuring expertise and product capabilities.
We continue to significantly increase our global footprint where we believe we have a competitive advantage and can best serve our clients, employees and shareholders. By putting our clients at the center of everything we do, we provide high value-added solutions and contribute to economic growth as Asia’s global investment bank.

Investment Banking

Global Markets

Corporate Infrastructure









Annisa Lee 
Head of Flow Credit Analysis, Asia ex-Japan










Kevin Gaynor 
Global Head of Asset Allocation Strategy










George Goncalves 
Head of US Rates Strategy










Selim Toker 
Hedging Balance Sheet Risk










Nick Kenworthy 
Head of Research Sales, UK










Richard Byworth 
Head of Multi Strategy Sales, Asia ex-Japan












Investment Banking

Our Investment Banking Division provides a variety of advisory and capital-raising solutions to corporations, financial institutions, governments and public-sector organizations around the world. Our global teams act as geographic, product and industry specialists.
Corporate Finance Advisory: Sector and country coverage professionals are critical in identifying and analyzing deal opportunities and managing client relationships. The ideas generated can have a tremendous impact on a sector.
Global Finance and Capital Raising: Global Finance is a combination of product experts, who are focused on providing tailor-made client solutions in debt or equity financing. The group works closely with Corporate Finance, M&A and Global Markets to originate structure and execute deals across the globe.
We deliver Asia to our clients – accessing deep pools of liquidity and dynamic growth markets, with cross-border collaborations in M&A, DCM, ECM, and solutions businesses.

×


Global Markets

Nomura's Global Markets Division handles client transactions for financial institutions, corporates, governments and investment funds around the world. We act as market makers, trading in fixed income and equity securities, including currencies, interest rates and credit in cash, derivatives and structured products. We have taken market-leading positions across the globe by leveraging the strength of our talent, client relationships and technology.
By developing strong relationships with our client base through consistent interaction, independent advice and pre-eminent access to Asia, we have built a powerful global franchise across interest rates, currency and credit products. Our client services cover both high-volume flow products and carefully tailored structured solutions. We have adapted to the changing financial landscape to build a client centric focus differentiated by innovation, electronic and service excellence and market-leading derivatives capabilities.

×


Corporate Infrastructure

Our Corporate Infrastructure Division is what underpins the success of the entire organization. It is internationally renowned and structured to deliver a world-class client service. We rely on it to build and support the business, helping us deliver innovative financial solutions that set Nomura apart in the global marketplace.
In our highly competitive and fast-paced industry, strong infrastructure teams are fundamental to our success. Work in these areas (Compliance, Finance, Operations or Technology) with us and you will operate at the forefront of your field, as well as gaining a valuable insight into how Nomura operates on a global scale.

×



Our People
Talented people drive our business forward


Nomura believes in harnessing the ambition of talented and intelligent people to drive our business forward. Our graduates' entrepreneurial spirits are helping us to realize our strategy to become Asia's global investment banking. Hear how Nomura impressed them, their experiences as interns and graduates and the evolution of their roles and responsibilities since joining.






Charmaine Chong
Investment Banking

Charmaine Chong - Investment Banking, Singapore


Graduated in Liberal Arts with a focus in Economics, Vassar College, USA, 2011

For most liberal arts students, investment banking may not seem like a natural career choice. I was initially skeptical as well. Although an analyst position provides the fast-paced working environment with high expectations I was looking for, I was concerned that my limited finance knowledge compared to students with a business-related degree would hold me back. However, as I went through the recruiting process, I realized that investment banks are looking for more than just the right answers to technical questions – they also value the diversity in thought and depth of communication and interpersonal skills that liberal arts graduates can bring to the table.
While the first few weeks as an intern or analyst can be daunting, especially for those without a finance background, Nomura has structured a training program that accelerates the learning curve. With a comprehensive curriculum and warm and consistent mentoring to support one’s learning, the only other necessity is a passion to improve and to deliver high-quality work.
There were two things I was greatly appreciative of within days of joining Nomura: the strong team spirit and the willingness of my colleagues to consider all opinions and ideas. Even as an intern, I was integrated immediately into and considered part of the team. My responsibilities and contributions grew along with my capabilities, regardless of my title.
Having served in both capital markets and corporate finance sides of investment banking, I’m grateful for the in-depth exposure to a wide variety of financial products and companies across Asia. In my current role as an analyst in the corporate finance team, I’m constantly juggling different deals with different clients, deliverables and deadlines – what excites me especially is when the work my team produces benefits our clients’ growth strategies.
Nomura continues to expand rapidly. Building on our significant momentum, we continue to generate new business opportunities. This is the place for graduates looking for a stimulating and intellectually challenging environment and who want to be an integral part of an exciting future.

×




Christopher Read
Corporate Infrastructure

Christopher Read - Finance


BSc in Banking, Finance & Management, Loughborough University

The opportunity to be given real work and responsibility from day one impressed me and was a key reason I applied to Nomura. As an intern in the Fixed Income Product Control team I was responsible for producing daily profit and loss statements, which included reconciling various data feeds, comparing desk estimates and communicating any discrepancies to the traders. This gave me great exposure across the desk and with the traders. As I became more confident and efficient, I was given additional products and traders to cover.
Nomura excels at providing real opportunities to interns and graduates. In the current economic climate there are many challenges but also opportunities to get more involved. I have increasingly been given more responsibility, while some of my friends are still doing similar roles to when they started. 
The graduate training included technical and soft skills sessions. The soft skills "Delivering powerful presentations" training was particularly valuable - our pitches were recorded and then replayed, which was really helpful and informative.
My responsibilities have steadily grown since joining the rotational graduate program. I have been heavily involved in several insightful pieces of analysis for senior management. In Cost Management & Analytics I developed an internal cost allocation process, improved the content and insight of internal Management Information (MI) and worked on delivering several cost saving initiatives. In the Regulatory Reporting team I have taken ownership of several key processes and reports and recently played a key project role in the delivery and reporting of the new CRDIV Liquidity Coverage Ratio (LCR) to the UK Regulator (PRA).
My top tip for future interns is flexibility and networking. You have to be flexible in your approach to work. Be ready to take on new projects and tasks that may be outside your remit. Be proactive and don’t be afraid to challenge the status quo.

×




Clarence Nahan
Investment Banking

Clarence Nahan - Investment Banking, London


Masters in Management, ESCP Europe

Route to Nomura: I joined the full time program after being an intern for 10 months at Lehman Brothers
Since joining I have increasingly been exposed to the firm’s deal flow and I have worked on landmark transactions like the Moncler €784m IPO. I have really been able to make an impact and take ownership of key work streams. Moreover, since my arrival, the team has expanded with the arrival of new analysts and interns, allowing me to mentor them and share all the training that I had received as a junior banker. Over the past years I have also been more involved in Nomura’s citizenship initiatives - volunteering at our partner secondary school as a visiting French teacher.
The Equity Capital Markets team focuses on Nomura's largest corporate clients. As a team we provide advisory and execution capabilities on cash-equity-related products including: IPOs, rights issues, ABBs (strategic or financial stake divestment) and a range of other strategic dialogues, like stake building, dividend policy and capital structure.
Nomura gives you the chance to be part of a new story in investment banking. We want candidates with the energy and the maturity to step up quickly. You need to be bright, full of energy and have a long-term view. 
I'm very excited about my future here. At Nomura, we are not bogged down with major reputational issues - instead we're concentrating on building our franchise. Our move to our current landmark office in the City (of London) was a symbol of this commitment to Europe.
I interview many of our graduates. We look for people with strong analytical and interpersonal skills plus a keen interest in markets.

×




Elisabeth Kilbane
Global Markets

Elisabeth Kilbane, Global Markets, New York


Majored in Economics at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology (MIT)

Route to Nomura: The summer before my senior year of college, I interned with Nomura and at the end of the summer, I received and accepted an offer of full-time employment.
To prepare for my interview, I read up on current events and the markets, and I considered in advance the personal experiences that had led me to applying. I also researched Nomura itself, so that I understood the firm’s role in the global finance landscape. My advice is to stay calm during the interview. You may be asked some technical questions that are difficult to prepare for ahead of time. Give the questions your best shot, but don't let them overwhelm you or cloud the rest of your interview. 
During my internship, I was given the opportunity to work on projects with very senior people. I was trusted to take responsibility for projects and expected to contribute in a meaningful way right from the start. Because of this, there were high expectations for development throughout the program, and I felt as though my mentors were pushing me towards goals in my product knowledge. This challenging yet supportive environment proved to be an excellent learning experience, and I learned more in my summer with Nomura than I had in any previous internship. 
Having never worked in financial markets before, I was very unsure of what to expect going into my summer internship. I walked into training knowing only the basics of finance, and I expected the experience to be overwhelming and highly competitive. However, I found my peers and mentors to be extremely helpful throughout my summer at Nomura. 
I believe the key to a successful internship is to express a genuine interest in the products. Interns should work to understand to the best of their ability, the products of the desks they rotate through. You can demonstrate your knowledge by showing real curiosity and asking intelligent questions. While meeting a lot of people is of course important, the value of this is increased tremendously by having high quality conversations and leaving a positive impression on those you meet.

×




George Robinson
Investment Banking

George Robinson, Investment Banking, New York


Economics degree, Brigham Young University

Nomura has several major strengths. The first is its Asian connection. Research analysts agree that a lot of investment will be coming out of Asia in the next several years, especially Japan, and given the difference in culture, it is extremely helpful that Nomura has the connections and the knowledge to know how to deal with Asian buyers. Nomura is also a place where I will be given the opportunity to make real contributions and where I would have the best opportunity to learn and develop myself. 
I prepared for interviews by studying the finance and accounting topics I knew were important in interviews and practiced how to answer interview questions well. I also networked with professionals from Nomura and learned about the firm and got tips from them about how to interview well at Nomura. In addition to these things, I would also advise students who are about to apply for internships to regularly read the news, specifically the Wall Street Journal, and be able to talk about important and trending topics.
A typical day for me as an intern in the Industrials group would start just before 9am and if there wasn’t a deck that needed to be printed or some work finalized, I would catch up on the news. Around 9:30 I would meet with members of the deal team and we would go over what we had done so far and what else was needed.
From that point until around 12pm I would work on some aspect of the deal or pitch. This work varied greatly. On one particular pitch I spent a great deal of time helping create the strategic positioning pages for a company, the strategic buyer list with associated rationale and I helped build the model. 

                            After lunch we would circle up again and discuss what changes we would want to make and how to better present what
 we had. Throughout the afternoon there could be various meetings that I would attend. These could consist of sitting in on client or industry specialist calls or meeting with mentors or senior bankers.

                            At around 6.30pm most people would order dinner and eat together. After dinner we would circle up again and figure out what our next steps were and from that point until sometime between 11pm and 1am we would work. There are a lot of ebbs and flows in the work, and this was a typical day when we were particularly busy preparing for an important pitch. 
The people at Nomura are some of the most down-to-earth and nicest people I’ve had the fortune of working with. Given these things I’m very happy that I chose Nomura and I couldn’t imagine now having made any other choice.

×




Ifiok Ekwere
Investment Banking

Ifiok Ekwere - Investment Banking, London


Joint Honors Bachelors degree in Biology and Management, Imperial College London

What impressed me about Nomura was the structure of the internship program. From a non-finance background I was keen to complete an internship in a bank where I would have the opportunity to learn as much as I could about the industry and to understand where my skill set would be best suited. Before the internship I thought I would be most suited to an Equities role, however, rotating between Equities and Fixed Income helped me realize my skill set and interests were much better suited to a role in Fixed Income. 
As an intern my typical day started at around 6.30am. I was responsible for summarizing key points in our trading meeting and updating the team. I attended desk-specific meetings to organise the day’s tasks before the markets opened for trading. After trading, I would review the days' trades with the settlement teams to ensure they had been booked correctly. On the FX Sales desk I also built an Excel model that was used as a platform to structure sales strategies.
As an Associate my typical day starts around 7.30am with a morning meeting call. I then put together a summary of the news highlights from Bloomberg relating to the companies that we manage in our loan portfolio. During earnings season, I will put together earnings summaries and circulate these to the relevant teams and people within the bank. If there is a 'live' deal being assessed by the desk, there will often be a series of meetings with colleagues across the Investment Banking, Finance and Risk Management divisions to discuss and analyse the merits of the deal before it is sent to the necessary approval committees. 
A highlight for me was the Management Buy-Out of Iceland Foods – it was the first deal I was responsible for from start to finish and it was a thrill to see it announced in the news upon completion!
As a graduate I have been involved in a number of well-known EMEA / Americas transactions. I find the investment banking industry fascinating and am looking forward to gaining more experience and progressing at an even faster pace with my career over the next few years.

×




Jaap Tanke
Global Markets

Jaap Tanke - Global Markets, London


Masters in Finance, University of Amsterdam

Route to Nomura: After I graduated, I immediately joined the Global Markets summer internship program and at the end of the program I received an offer to join full time.
What initially impressed me about Nomura was the open culture and how approachable the people were.

During my internship I rotated between the Managed Accounts desk in Equities and the Corporate Equity derivatives team. In the first rotation, I assisted the team with small tasks as they were in the middle of launching a new fund. In my second rotation I learned how to price different option structures with in-house software researched specific stocks and contributed towards different slides of pitch book presentations.
The intern training was very helpful. The Bloomberg and Thomson Reuters training ensured I was up to speed to complete tasks while on the desk. There were a lot of networking opportunities and we also contributed towards raising money for the charity Rainbow Trust by organizing different activities for employees to sponsor the interns. The cross divisional activities ensured we met with fellow interns across the firm.
As a graduate I had immediate exposure to clients (after completing my FCA qualification). The immediate exposure allowed me to build key relationships which have resulted in doing day to day business with some top accounts now. My focus at the moment is to become a specialist in one specific product, in order to eventually become the go-to person for my clients in this product.
My top advice for an intern is to explore the firm; sit with different desks and divisions as this will give you a very good overview of the different positions available at a global investment bank. In addition, try to add value on top of your main day to day tasks; this will demonstrate that you are eager and a hard worker.

×




Joyce Su
Global Markets

Joyce Su - Global Markets, Hong Kong


Graduated with an MA in Mathematics of Finance, Columbia University, 2010

I returned to Asia after working and studying in the US for a number of years. What motivated me to join Nomura when I moved back is its reputation - it's the best bank in Asia, with a growing global reach. The people here also influenced my decision: from my first interview they gave me their time and expertise so that I could find the best role to match my skill set. They wanted me to maximize my career potential, as well as match me to an area that would benefit them - it was a two-way decision.
What sets Nomura above other investment banks is the culture. The rapidly expanding global operations are making us a leader in the industry, and this momentum gives the bank an entrepreneurial feel. It's a place where smart people work together and encourage each other to develop their own creative ideas.
I am part of the Prime Services team, financing and structuring hedge funds for our sales people and traders. From day one I participated in so many aspects of the business and my manager was keen to get my input and opinion on our projects. In fact, he still is! I've learnt never to be afraid of bringing ideas to the table, because the managers here always give you the chance to excel. If your ideas are good, they will use them.
I'm looking forward to forging a successful career at Nomura. It's a place where you can learn and absorb knowledge quickly, and use it to move up to higher levels of responsibility. If you have the right attitude and a passion for investment banking, this is the place to be.

×




Sameer Rahman
Global Markets

Sameer Rahman - Global Markets, Singapore


Graduated in Mathematics, University of New South Wales.  MBA in International Business, University of Technology, Sydney

I never doubted that I wanted to work in investment banking, simply because the nature of the industry is such that it challenges you to push yourself to do the best you can. Joining this industry, I knew I would be working with (or competing against) some of the brightest people around which motivates me to go the extra mile.
I was attracted to Nomura because of its strong business culture, positive team environment and, most importantly, the excellent opportunities afforded to young graduates such as myself. We are growing at an incredible pace and it’s truly an exciting place to be, if one looks at the footprint we already have in this industry and what we are striving to achieve.
From the beginning, the 6 week graduate training program in London helped us strengthen our knowledge across different asset classes as well as forge meaningful relationships with our peers from the different offices across the world. It gave us the base to settle in immediately once we joined our desk.  
I was trusted to cover clients and asked to come up with trade ideas very early on. My manager was very encouraging and it gave me the confidence to learn and grow very quickly. Looking back on the past year and putting everything in perspective, joining Nomura was one of the best decisions I made. 

×




Sapna Aeri
Corporate Infrastructure

Sapna Aeri - Technology, London


Bachelors Computer Science degree, City University London

Route to Nomura: I took a third year industrial placement with Lehman Brothers, which later resulted in a role at Nomura.
I was impressed by Nomura as it appeared to be constantly growing and adapting. This meant I would be involved in new projects and new and evolving technology to cope with the greater global demand. This was (and still is) an exciting prospect!
As an intern I gained vast exposure to the variety of roles I could pursue. I attended networking events, panel discussions and lunch & learn sessions. The thought of working in an investment bank was initially quite intimidating, however I was surprised at how freely I was able to interact with colleagues of varying seniority, allowing me to build a strong network and experience a range of outlooks and perspectives.
The graduate training was really useful. With a background in IT, I had limited understanding of banking, so it was useful to gain a more detailed understanding. We have had further product specific training and personal development sessions since then, which is great for understanding how you are being perceived by others and how to present yourself in different situations.
Every day you learn something new; I could be holding discussions with the desk, brokers or development team, or discussing new ideas, projects and enhancements to our current systems. My responsibilities span from kicking off and looking after projects for the desk, managing system upgrades and testing, as well as ensuring trade flows are being handled correctly. I am learning about option trading directly from the desk and the management of the trades through testing on our FX options platform. As banking evolves and changes, I have the opportunity to learn about the new technology on offer, scope out new requirements and see the projects through from start to end.
Since joining as a graduate I have progressed to the position of Senior Business Analyst within FX Options technology; I have led the delivery of global high profile projects for both regulatory and business purposes and I have improved the quality of deliverables by implementing a thorough suite of testing. 

×




Sayaka Azuma
Global Markets

Sayaka Azuma - Global Markets, London


Graduated in Economics, Kobe University

After studying Economics at university I developed a passion for finance; investment banking seemed like the perfect place for me to explore the industry further. For me, Nomura was the best choice. It's famous in Japan, not only for being at the forefront of banking but also for its hard-work ethic and dynamic culture.
In my time here I have seen the fusing of traditional and new, with Nomura's acquisition of Lehman Brothers. This has formed a culture that encourages new thinking based on strong foundations, and that makes it a really interesting place to work.
As an execution trader, I receive and execute orders from our London office for Japanese stocks. I can win money very quickly, and lose it too, which makes my job really exciting. Each time I succeed, it makes me want more. That is what drives me to come to work every day. Being in constant contact with my colleagues in London also makes me feel part of an international business, not a Japanese bank. I'm not sure how many other places could offer that.
What makes Nomura an exciting place to be right now is the change we are going through. If you have ambition and drive, you can use those talents to get involved in this change process, grow the company, and really boost your career.

×




Vincent Li
Global Markets

Vincent Li - Global Markets, Hong Kong


Global Business in Finance, The Hong Kong University of Science and Technology, 2008

What's always made investment banking an appealing career choice for me is the dynamic nature of the industry, and the interaction you get with all kinds of people and clients. When I was selecting the starting point of my career, I wanted a place that offered me the opportunity to grow and learn quickly. Nomura is a company that is rapidly expanding its footprint across the financial world and it matched well with my career objectives.
When I first started at Nomura, I had the chance to spend six months in London on the Convertibles desk in Sales, Trading and Research, which was a great experience. When I came back to Hong Kong I moved over to the Equity Derivatives desk. Working with a team from the rest of the world, my role is about generating cross-regional trade ideas for our clients. Being able to produce profitable and unique ideas that no other investment bank offers in the market is a very satisfying feeling. This is also the driving force behind waking up every morning to anticipate another unpredictable, yet exciting day.
During the beginning, what really surprised me were the opportunities I was given at a junior level. Very early on in my role the firm was happy to publish my ideas and let me deal with clients. They were very trusting in my abilities, which I really appreciated, and this experience helped me to learn a lot quickly.
Nomura is a great place for new graduates because of the team culture, knowledge sharing and training programmes. The firm is growing very quickly- I don't think we can be matched on our current growth across the world. If you have ambition and are keen on learning, no other company will be able to give you the opportunities and exposure you're going to get here. 

×




Yuta Arndt Osada
Global Markets

Yuta Arndt Osada - Global Markets,Tokyo


Keio University

I joined Nomura because you get a lot of responsibility from a very early stage, and everyone works together as a team to meet client needs.
My typical day starts with a morning meeting from 7:10am to share information and have discussions on the stock price from the previous day. We start calling clients from 8:00am with the information from the morning meeting.
It is always extremely busy until 9:00am as many clients prefer to be called before the market opens in order to hear the information and be prepared for the initial reaction of stocks.
After the market opens I continue to talk to clients or go back to the Analysts to have further discussions and looking at the initial stock reactions.
From 12:00pm I usually join meetings with clients or sometime corporates to hear what clients are currently interested in.
At about 3:00pm after the market closes, we often have equity deals, which makes it extremely busy again. I start calling clients to notify them of the deal and arrange road show meetings.
At 5:00pm, if a deal is launched, I join a meeting with the company. Otherwise I am usually preparing for the next day’s morning meeting or discussing stocks with our Analysts, after which I leave the office.
What sets Nomura apart from the other banks is the spirit to work together globally as a team to satisfy client needs all times. I joined the firm because of this and this is what I think differentiates us from others, and what makes it a very good place to work in.

×






Programs
We’re looking to recruit individuals who are motivated

An internship with Nomura is your opportunity to see what you could be part of. You will get first-hand experience of the possibilities a career in banking could bring you, and get a feel for our culture. You will also have the opportunity to create new networks, gain valuable on-the-job training and see what makes us the most exciting proposition in the investment banking world.
We aim to give our interns the same level of exposure as a first-year Analyst or Associate. That means you will work as a full member of the team, participating in team meetings, potentially meeting clients, forming effective working relationships and showing a real commitment to our goals and values. During the course of your internship you can expect to work closely with a buddy and have regular contact with senior mentors.


Global Markets

Investment Banking

Corporate infrastructure

Training Programs




If you're fascinated by the markets and their movements, cycles and patterns, then global markets is for you. Learn how we make the markets and handle major transactions for corporations, governments and investment funds around the globe. The internship is designed as a spring-board to a career in global markets where we will give you exposure to the challenges and opportunities a full-time Analyst or Associate will have in their first year with us. The full-time program, begins with orientation in New York and global training in our London office.
What's involved?
You will have an excellent introduction to the firm. Next, you will learn valuable, hands-on skills such as valuation, pricing and structuring. The emphasis here is on practical application - we will make sure that you quickly develop the technical proficiency and strong business skills you will need to thrive in this fast-moving market environment. And, throughout your development, you will be supported by a buddy, a mentor and our dedicated program management team.
Sales: You will learn the skills needed to develop and maintain strong relationships with institutional clients, including pension funds, hedge funds, insurance companies and others.
                            
Trading: You will buy and sell securities in the secondary market on behalf of clients or the firm, taking responsibility for market making and capital commitment.
                            
Research: You will collect, analyze and assess industry and company information, providing keen market insight and impressive investment ideas for institutional investors and internal clients.
                            
Structuring: You will develop expertise in designing and developing innovative products and strategies tailored to specific client needs.


If it's the challenge and excitement of investment banking that drives you, then this is the route for you. The internship is designed as a spring-board to a career in investment banking where we will give you exposure to the challenges and opportunities a full-time Analyst or Associate will have in their first year with us. The full-time program, begins with orientation in New York and global training in our London office. By the time you have finished, you will have all the functional skills, technical knowledge and tools you will need for an influential career.
What's involved?
Our internship and graduate programs will give you everything you need to join the front ranks of global investment bankers. You will develop knowledge and experience in accounting, modelling, valuation and deal structuring. You will find that the emphasis is on practical application - this way you can expect to make an immediate impact. And, throughout your development, you will be supported by a buddy, a mentor, and our dedicated program management team.
Deal execution: You will work closely with clients and execution teams (lawyers, accountants, consultants and bankers) on mandated transactions, including mergers and acquisitions, divestitures, capital raisings and restructurings.
                            
Client relationship management: We want to see you generating and presenting ideas at client meetings alongside senior bankers.
                            
Strategic analysis: We will train you to produce financial, structural and business risk analysis to support transactions and client presentations.
For an Associate role you must have or be completing an MBA and have relevant work experience.


If you want to gain a clear overview of a fast-moving global business, then consider choosing one of our corporate infrastructure programs. These programs in finance, operations, technology and risk will give you product-specific training in your chosen area.


Finance

Operations

Technology

Risk




Finance professionals play a critical role in creating and preserving shareholder value by providing business advice and ensuring control of the global franchise. This includes accounting, treasury, tax and regulatory services. This part of the business provides analysis and oversight, including our overall financial performance. Finance is also responsible for managing our funding and liquidity requirements and for interacting with our creditors and the rating agencies.
What's involved?
This program will provide you an opportunity to learn how we manage the flow of money in and out of the business through internal control systems. You will also enjoy an excellent overview of Nomura's performance, including revenues, expenses, regulatory capital and headcount. And you can expect to partner closely with senior business leaders in a highly collaborative and dynamic environment.


This is the organization that takes responsibility for the processing, control and settlement of Nomura's transactions. Operations provide support to the trading front office. Think of this division as the support and control infrastructure that enables Nomura to develop and deliver across the world.
What's involved?
Join Operations and you will be responsible for the management and execution of transactions in a way that maximizes profitability and minimizes risks. Expect to work closely with our sales, trading and IT teams as you develop innovative and efficient approaches to our clients' investment, liquidity and risk management needs.
What will I need?
To join our graduate program in operations, you will need: a minimum GPA of 3.5 in any discipline; a working knowledge of the finance industry; and a dynamic and proactive attitude.


Technology at Nomura involves working with, and designing, state-of-the-art information technology and risk management systems. These are the systems that can often give us that crucial, split-second edge over our competitors. Daily tasks range from infrastructure support and deployment to in-house development of complex modeling software and applications.
What's involved?
Expect to get involved in developing new applications to implement cutting-edge standards, constantly staying at the forefront of technology. You will develop an impressive level of technical knowledge and build your skills in systems development and support, using a range of technology packages (VB, SQL, Perl, C++, Java, XML, XSLT, JSP). In addition to this, you will gain an understanding of different financial products (such as equities, bonds, futures, options, swaps, exotic derivatives and quanto) and build complex and valuable knowledge of risk management methods and techniques as well as live trade analysis.
What will I need?
To join our graduate program in technology, you will need: a minimum GPA of 3.5 in any discipline; a working knowledge of the finance industry; and a dynamic and proactive attitude.


Our risk group is responsible for identifying, analyzing and managing our risk. The information and advice they give us shapes our risk appetite and risk decisions. By continually monitoring operational, credit and market risk, we are able to make quick, strong decisions that give us the best possible standing in the global marketplace.
What's involved?
When you start in risk, you will receive all the dedicated training and support you need to prepare you for your role. Our training program will provide you with an excellent introduction to the firm, as well as hands-on skills, such as: the techniques we use to analyze risk; how to manage our risk frameworks; and how to use technology packages like SQL and VBA. With this training you will be able to make an immediate impact on our business.
                                    
Operational risk management: You will work across our business functions to ensure they are managing their operational risks effectively.
                                    
Credit risk: Alongside our credit officers, you will analyze the credit quality of hedge funds and financial institutions before we take them on as clients.
                                    
Market risk: Focused on fixed-income markets, you will evaluate our exposure in cash and derivatives, making sure all relevant data is recorded and used in daily risk calculations.
What will I need?
Join our graduate program in risk, you will need: a minimum GPA of 3.5 in any discipline; a working knowledge of the finance industry; and a dynamic and proactive attitude.




Our training program builds Nomura's pipeline of future leaders and functional experts through the successful integration and development of early tenured professionals. The global nature of our programs is a key differentiator and our graduates begin their career with us in London with participants from EMEA, US and Asia offices. We will also provide you with ongoing learning and development opportunities throughout your career.
Our training program covers various modules, which include:

An introduction to Nomura, its strategy, platform and businesses
Providing a comprehensive understanding of the Analyst and Associate role in their respective division
Equipping our Analysts and Associates with the finance/technical skills essential for their career
Promote networks for collaboration amongst global colleagues




Global Markets

Investment Banking

Corporate Infrastructure




The Global Markets training program is designed to provide our Analysts and Associates with the knowledge and the skills required to make an immediate contribution to their team. The global course is the first step in the graduates' assimilation into Nomura and the development of their career.
The curriculum combines a broad Global Markets overview, financial fundamentals and specific divisional and functional content. Participants are exposed to senior leadership through integrated business speakers, success panels and networking events. The program also emphasizes Nomura's commitment to giving back to the community through an organized philanthropic activity.
The delivery of the continuous development curriculum takes place via a broad means, including classroom sessions, senior speaker series, e-Learning, subject matter experts, mentoring programs and team-building events.


The training program is designed to provide a solid foundation in preparation for a smooth transition into investment banking at Nomura.
The program comprehensively covers: accounting, corporate finance/valuation, financial modelling, fixed income and equity product analytics and banking group overviews. Complementing the classroom learning, Analysts and Associates complete assignments, deliver presentations on financial news and attend social events arranged to facilitate teamwork and peer interaction.
Our continuing education series comprises of sessions delivered by bankers on a variety of topics such as DCM, ECM, M&A process, LBO modelling. In addition, all Analysts and Associates have the opportunity to attend soft skills training, which focus on presentation, communication skills, personal impact, negotiation skills and relationship management skills.


Nomura's Corporate Infrastructure training program comprises of online resources, classroom based technical and product training and a soft skills curriculum.
The two weeks of intensive training when graduates join offers a comprehensive introduction to banking in general, along with financial products and concepts. The training is delivered by external trainers and senior internal subject matter experts. During the initial training graduates will participate in classroom based seminars, trading simulations, business overviews and networking events.
Whatever division you join, you will benefit from ongoing performance feedback. At Nomura, our managers spend time focusing on your career development. They will dedicate considerable amounts of time to coach and mentor you, helping you to realize your full potential.










News & Campus Events
The graduates are set to enjoy great success

We arrange a number of campus events during the recruitment season, which include company presentations, skills sessions, careers fairs and networking events at various universities and business schools.
Nomura campus events provide students with an opportunity to meet with business representatives and the graduate recruitment team. Our team can provide you with application and interview advice, and we are always keen to meet talented, ambitious students on campus. You should check with your careers service for more information on Nomura events on campus.
Know Nomura Facts


No. 1 Institutional Investor All-Japan Research team ranking for the fifth consecutive year
No. 1 in Nikkei Veritas analyst ranking survey for Fixed Income Analyst / Economist survey for the fourth consecutive year
Nomura ranked #1 for FX Research in Institutional Investor’s All-America Fixed Income Research Survey
Nomura wins Best IPO: Suntory Beverage & Food $3.72bn IPO
Xstrata Glencore, $90bn joint financial advisor
Grifols acquisition of the Transfusion Diagnostics Unit of Novartis AG, $1.68bn






Apply Now
See what opportunities are available to you
Apply Here
Apply Here

Whether you are just entering the industry or an experienced professional looking for your next exciting opportunity, working at Nomura is a unique opportunity to make a difference in the industry in a way that is unprecedented. We have quite a number of roles for which we are currently accepting applications and we invite you to go through our list of global opportunities and send your CV to us.
Please click here to review current opportunities.
Please click here to view the latest Americas recruiting brochure.



Application Process

Application FAQs

Interview Tips

Mock Interview

Glossary




You will need to apply through your university or business school careers service. We accept applications from all degree disciplines. While your degree subject doesn't matter, you must be numerate, with an interest in finance and have a desire to work in the investment banking industry.
Your application will be screened and if you are invited to interviews, you should be prepared to answer questions relating to our competencies:

Problem solving/Analytics
Team skills/Professionalism
Leadership
Initiative
Communication





Does Nomura offer internship programs?

Yes, we offer 10 week internships in the Summer, as well as a 3-6 month internship within our Technology business, part time throughout the school year. 



May I apply to more than one division?

Yes. You can apply for up to three divisions, however, you should do as much research as possible beforehand. It is important to understand which business area would best match your skills set and interests. We will expect you to be able to discuss your choice, and show both enthusiasm for, and knowledge of the various roles.



What should I expect during the interview process? 

If you apply and you are selected for first-round interviews, you will have one on-campus interview or first round in our New York office. During the final round interviews, you will have four 30-minute, one-on-one interviews with senior business representatives (a banker who is vice president or above).
Find out more here.



What is Nomura looking for in candidates?


Professional presence (including communication skills, attitude, assertiveness, self confidence and a high level of maturity). 
Commitment and drive (including bias to action, resourcefulness, work ethic, drive to excel and tenacity). 
Problem solving and analytical skills (including analytical approach, logic, commercial intuition and quantitative ability).
Planning and execution (including attention to detail, results orientation, creative approach and time management skills). 
Collaboration (including relationship-building, team orientation, diplomacy and respect).
Leadership (including persuasion skills, motivating others, integrity and empathy). Throughout the CV screening and interview process, you will be assessed on these core competencies.




I've been accepted for an interview. Do you have any tips?

We want you to do your very best at interview. So take a look at our section on interview tips. In this section, you can complete a mock interview and read our guide on interview etiquette.



Will Nomura sponsor work authorization? 

Yes, we will sponsor those students we offer, but the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services will ultimately make the final decision as to whether this will be granted.





There is no need to be nervous at interview - we want you to do well and to show us your potential and what you can do. Preparation is essential and well prepared candidates are more confident, provide more thorough and focused answers and are therefore more likely to be successful.
Use our step by step guide to ensure you take the time to prepare wisely; the key is to ensure your preparation is carefully planned and focused.

Step 1

Step 2

Step 3

Step 4

Step 5




Focus - Structure and Plan your Preparation
Preparing for, and being interviewed is similar to sitting an exam; you won’t have time to cover everything, instead you will need to identify the key points and focus on the relevant material.
Firstly, you should congratulate yourself in being selected for interview stage and have confidence in your ability. Then, ask yourself the following questions:

What will the interviewers want to know?
                                        
An interview is not an opportunity to divulge everything you know- instead you need to focus on what is relevant to the company and the position you’re applying for
To identify what is most relevant, you will need to fully understand the role, it’s requirements and the key skills and competencies required


How are you going to sell yourself?
                                        
What is your unique selling point? I.e. what sets you apart from the competition?
How do you want the interviewers to remember you after the interview – what key points do you want them to recall?


How will you be assessed?
                                        
You can’t start your preparation until you know what you are preparing for
Read the interview format thoroughly to identify how you will be assessed (i.e. Interviews, case study exercises, and tests). If you’re unsure – ask.


What are the core competencies required for the role?
                                        
Your interview performance and ultimately if you are successful or not, will be dependent on how you perform against core competencies
Identify what are the key competencies required for the role and for the company
What examples do you have to demonstrate each competency? Have you considered examples outside academia (i.e. sports, music, drama, volunteering, charity, mentoring, societies or other extracurricular activities) 
What achievements are you most proud of and why – which competency do they demonstrate?





Interview Questions
Interviewers will use a variety of questions to assess your ability against each competency. Ensure you are familiar with each type of question and how to structure your answers accordingly.
Types of interview questions may include:

Competency based questions
                                        
These require you to provide a real life example to explain how you behaved in a certain situation. Past behaviour is used as an indicator to assess potential future performance
Delivering a structured answer is crucial - research the STAR method to guide you
Top Tip: Ensure your examples are varied and recent (the more recent the past behaviour; the greater the indication of future ability)


Technical questions
                                        
Practice! There are many online resources or books available with practice questions
Questions may include basic accounting, valuation, brain teasers and mental arithmetic
Top tip: Brain teasers – the key is not the answer; it is the how you derive at the answer. The interviewer is assessing your ability to formulate a logical and methodical response


CV, cover letter and application questions
                                        
Ensure you have thoroughly re-read each document and identify any obvious questions
Top tip: Practice articulating your experience in a concise and structured manner out loud (it doesn’t always sound the same as when you practice in your head). 


Industry related questions
                                        
Interviewers will assess your interest, understanding and industry knowledge
Top tip: Form an opinion – digest the information you read and form your own judgment. Use facts and statistics to back up your conclusions





Research
There are a number of readily available resources to help you prepare. Make sure you fully utilise all resources available to you. These may include:

Online resources: Company website, press releases, annual reports, research publications, social media and online forums
School career services and recruitment events 
Networks – academic Staff, alumni, peers, family and friends – even if they do not have a financial services background, they can help you practice questions 



Your Questions
An interview is a two way process. It is an opportunity for you to assess if the company, role and culture is right for you. You will be given time to ask questions at the end of the interview, so you should ensure you use this time wisely. 

Plan questions to ask in advance - ensure they are relevant, well-thought-out and to the point
Show you’ve done your research and use the opportunity to demonstrate your interest



Plan the Interview Day
Preparing as much as possible in advance of your interview day will remove many of the inevitable nerves associated with the process.

Before the interview:
                                        
Dress professionally. Plan you outfit the day before and ensure you wear corporate attire
Be Punctual. Plan your route and account for delays in public transport
Aim to arrive 15 minutes before your interview start time. Contact us if problems arise and ensure you have noted the name and contact details of who to contact should this happen
Take a notebook, a pen (that works) and a calculator. Take a copy of your CV and application form
Remember: Be polite to everyone you meet, your interview begins as soon as you walk through the door of the building ore recent the past behaviour; the greater the indication of future ability)


During the Interview:
                                        
Ensure your cell phone is turned off
Greet your interviewer(s) with a firm handshake. Remember their name(s)
Maintain eye contact with your interviewer(s) and be aware of your body language – sit upright, don’t fidget and smile!
Listen carefully to questions you are asked. If you are unclear about anything, ask for clarification
Be honest. Back up your answers with real examples. If you exaggerate or lie it will show up in pre-employment checks
Relax - whether you are successful or not, the interview is a valuable learning experience. Make sure you get something out of it.
Close the interview – thank your interviewer for their time. If you’ve enjoyed the experience and you look forward to hearing about the next steps – tell us


After your Interview:
                                        
Be responsive. Following the interview, go back to your recruiter and continue to build a relationship
If you are offered a position it is unprofessional to renege (to accept and then later decline). This could be the first impression you create in the industry - you never know what the future holds









Q: Tell me about yourself

This is one of the most popular interview questions. It allows the interviewer to assess how you react in an unstructured situation and you answer provides an insight to what you think is most important.
Tip – focus on what will be of most interest to the interviewers. Ensure your answer is structured, brief and highlights your most important achievements.
Follow up questions may include:

Why did you choose your place of study? 
What courses have you most / least enjoyed and why?
Talk me through your internship experiences
What are you interests and hobbies (outside academic)? 
What are the most important things to you in a job?




Q: Why Banking?

We look for people who have a strong interest in investment banking. Interview Questions will determine how motivated you are and your rationale behind your decisions.

Why do you want to work in investment banking?
What do you think an Analyst does on a typical day?
Why are you interested in this division?
Where do you see yourself in five years? Ten years?
Explain the financial crisis 
If I gave you a million dollars today, how would you invest your money?
Which business publications do you read and why?




Q: Why Nomura?

We want to employ graduates who are passionate about joining Nomura and representing our brand

Why do you want to work for Nomura? 
What differentiates us from our competitors?
What is the share price of Nomura today?
What do you hope to get out of a job?
What other banks are you interviewing with?




Q: Skills

Your interviewer’s want to understand what sets you apart from the competition - sell yourself.

Why should we hire you? 
What skills have you got that make you suited to the role?
What are your strengths/development areas?
What is your greatest achievement and why?




Competency Questions

Show us proof that you are the kind of graduate we are looking for. Give concrete examples from any aspect of your life that show where you have personally made a difference.

Tell me about a time when you were creative
Tell me about a time when you had to manage conflicting priorities
Tell me about when you have missed an important deadline
What has been your biggest failure, professional or personal - and what did you learn?
Describe an occasion when you have had difficulties working in a team
What is the biggest risk you have ever taken?
How would you deal with a difficult client that puts you under pressure?
If a client told you that they wanted to improve their portfolio performance in the next 12 months, what would you suggest as potential strategies




Tips from our Graduates


Understand how the bank operates, the different roles available and the characteristics and tasks that each role entails
Don’t regurgitate generic questions and answers; it is quite obvious to those who work in the industry when someone has spent time reading and understanding concepts and news
Be yourself! It is important that the interviewer can see your personality in order to stand out from the rest
Keep up to date with relevant news - understand the current drivers in the industry
Do the obvious – read the latest annual report and CEO’s letter. Gain an insight into the firms values and strategy
We look for people with strong analytical and interpersonal skills, plus a keen interest in markets and equities. 
We want candidates with the energy and the maturity to step up to quite senior positions quickly – ensure you demonstrate your ability to do this
Use your Careers services – they have direct contact with the recruiters and can offer invaluable advice you cannot find online
Be proactive - speak to graduates at fairs and presentations to get the ‘inside information’






Asset and Liability Management (ALM): the practice of managing risks that arise due to mismatches between assets and liabilities of the financial institution.
Bond: an instrument of indebtedness of the bond issuer to the holders. It is a debt security, under which the issuer owes the holders a debt and, depending on the terms of the bond, is obliged to pay them interest (the coupon) and/or to repay the principal at a later date, termed the maturity date
CAGR: “Compound Annual Growth Rate” – the year-over-year percentage growth rate of an investment over a specified period of time 
Capex: Acronym meaning Capital Expenditures, that are funds used by a company to acquire or upgrade physical assets such as property, industrial buildings or equipment. This type of outlay is made by companies to maintain or increase the scope of their operations
D&A: Acronym meaning Depreciation and Amortization, a category of expenditure by which a company gradually records the loss in value of a tangible (Depreciation) and Intangible (Amortization) asset
Deleveraging: Reduction of the leverage ratio, or the percentage of debt in the balance sheet of a single economic entity, such as a household or a firm.
Discount rate: The interest rate used in discounted cash flow analysis to determine the present value of future cash flows. The discount rate takes into account the time value of money (the idea that money available now is worth more than the same amount of money available in the future because it could be earning interest) and the risk or uncertainty of the anticipated future cash flows (which might be less than expected).
EBITDA: Acronym meaning Earnings Before Interest, Taxes, Depreciation and Amortization
EBIT: Acronym meaning Earnings Before Interest and Taxes
ETF: Exchange traded funds. An exchange traded fund is an investment fund traded on stock exchanges, just like stocks. An ETF holds assets such as stocks, commodities or bonds, and trades close to its net asset value over the course of the trading day.
EV: “Enterprise Value” – Equal to Equity Value plus Net Debt (or minus Net Cash)
FCF: “Free Cash Flow” – Measure of cash generation used in fundamental valuation of a business. Equal to EBIT x (1 - tax rate) + depreciation and amortisation - changes in working capital - capex 
Forward interest rates: An interest rate that is specified now for a loan that will occur at a specified future date. As with current interest rates, forward interest rates include a term structure that shows the different forward rates offered to loans of different maturities.
Hedge: an investment made in order to reduce the risk of adverse price movements in a security, by taking an offsetting position in a related security, such as options or short sales.
LTM: Acronym meaning Last Twelve Months
IRR: Acronym meaning internal rate of return. The IRR corresponds to the rate of return on an investment. The IRR of a project is the discount rate that will give it a net present value of zero
Market Cap: Market capitalisation or market cap is a value of a corporation as determined by the market price of its common stock (shares). It is calculated by multiplying the number of outstanding shares by the current market price of the share
Market liquidity: an asset's ability to be sold without causing a significant movement in the price and with minimum loss of value.
Opex: Acronym meaning Operating Expenditures, a category of expenditure that a business incurs as a result of performing its normal business operations 
Payout ratio: The amount of earnings paid out in dividends to shareholders
Shareholder loan: an instrument used to distribute cash to shareholders while minimising a company’s tax liability. Not typically included within net debt 
Swap: highly liquid financial derivative instruments in which two parties agree to exchange interest rate cash flows, based on a specified notional amount from a fixed rate to a floating rate (or vice versa) or from one floating rate to another.
Swaption: An option granting its owner the right but not the obligation to enter into an underlying interest rate swap. A payer swaption gives the owner of the swaption the right to enter into a swap where they pay the fixed leg and receive the floating leg. A receiver swaption gives the owner of the swaption the right to enter into a swap in which they will receive the fixed leg, and pay the floating leg.
Ultimate forward rate (UFR): the theoretical forward interest rate to which forward rates converge. 
Yield to maturity: Discount rate at which the sum of all future cash flows from the bond (coupons and principal) is equal to the price of the bond.


Apply Here
Apply Here





Google Plus


Linkedin


YouTUBE


Twitter


































Careers, Nomura Asia-Pacific
















Experienced Professionals


Students & Graduates













Make an impression
We are looking for the next generation of entrepreneurs and leaders to shape our future








About Nomura
Careers in global investment banking

Make an impression
At Nomura you will discover a unique spirit and proud heritage. Since 1925, Nomura has built on a commitment to deliver unique value to clients by connecting markets East & West. We continue to service our clients in a differentiated way, providing creative and entrepreneurial solutions.
If you are keen to be a part of a highly nimble and diverse workforce that offers opportunities for you to build a long term career, then come and discover more about Nomura. This could be a perfect fit for you.
Since our founding we have accumulated an unparalled depth and breadth of experience throughout Asia and the rest of the world. We are a highly integrated global network of 27,000 people in 30 countries across our retail, asset management and wholesale (Global Markets and Investment Banking) divisions.
Help us realize our strategy and ambition by joining us in one of our three wholesale businesses:

Global Markets
Investment Banking
Corporate Infrastructure (ie, Operations, Technology and Finance)

For Japanese-language information about our opportunities in Japan click here.





Koji NagaiGroup CEO




The Nomura Brand Story




Diversity & corporate citizenship



Nomura History







Nomura Offices


































































































Message from the Group CEO

Supporting Japan's Future
Our home market of Japan is on the verge of significant change. Since the new government came to power in 2012, we have seen early signs of an economic recovery. To build on this momentum, we need to look hard at what the country requires and how we can contribute.
Given that Japan is the world's largest creditor nation and has the world's fastest aging population, one area that requires attention is the creation of a new social framework. At the same time, we need to revise the structure of our financial system. For Japan to grow sustainably into the future, the capital markets will have to play a more prominent role. Indeed, Japan's approximately ¥1,500 trillion in personal financial assets holds the key to the country's future growth. Nomura aims to support this growth by facilitating the flow of funds throughout the economy.
Connecting Markets East & West
Asia is expected to account for half of the world's GDP by 2050 and will no doubt remain the growth engine of the global economy over the coming years. However, for the region to realize its full potential, Asian countries must finance the large-scale infrastructure projects required to underpin economic growth. Japan can play a leading role here, growing together with the rest of Asia by putting its financial assets to work across the region. With Asia as our home market, this is an area in which Nomura has a distinct competitive advantage.
As economies around the world mature and become increasingly global, companies and investors in the West are looking East for growth opportunities. As the only Japanese financial institution with a truly global network, Nomura is well placed to connect markets in the East and the West by leveraging our franchise to provide liquidity in the world's capital markets. By meeting the needs of our global client base and expanding our business, we can contribute to economic growth and social development.
In doing so, we aim to win the trust of our clients and society as we work towards being Asia's global investment bank.

×


Nomura History



×


Diversity & corporate citizenship

Corporate citizenship
Nomura is actively involved in local communities in Asia, most notably where we do business, such as Australia, China, Hong Kong, India, Korea, Malaysia, Philippines, Singapore and Taiwan. Nomura focuses its regional volunteer and fundraising efforts towards educational and environmental initiatives, as well as programs focused on the elderly, through Nomura CARES (Community Affairs, Raising funds, and Employee Service), a grass-roots employee philanthropy committee.
In Hong Kong, Nomura CARES recently launched a unique partnership with Changing Young Lives Foundation

Changing Young Lives provides health, welfare, educational and recreational programs for disadvantaged children in Hong Kong.
We also participate in a number of other philanthropic and CSR-related activities which we participate in on an annual basis:

Hong Kong Cleanup - Each year the employees of Nomura take part in their own cleanup day at a local beach for four years running, which has engaged over 60,000 participates and cleaned over 250,000kg of waste from Hong Kong’s beaches.
UNICEF Marathon – dozens of Nomura employees complete the run and raise funds that go to providing mother’s in under developed countries with HIV tests.
Box of Hope – employees fill gift boxes for children in Southeast Asia with fun and educational items which are given around year-end holidays.
Earth Hour – Nomura participates in this global event, joining tens of millions of concerned citizens and corporations throughout the world in calling for action to save our planet for future generations.

With over $500,000HK raised for various charities and strong support from regional management, Nomura CARES will continue to widen its footprint to have a greater impact in the communities where we do business. The company always looks to create opportunities for a sustainable future, making sure that the decisions made today support the success of future generations.
Diversity and inclusion 
We want to harness the value of diversity to create a sustainable organisation, and drive performance, revenue, market share and profit. Our Diversity & Inclusion team partners with all employees to embed diversity into how we do business.
Diversity is critical to our success as a firm and to our ability to attract, develop, engage and retain the very best people, regardless of their background, from the widest talent pools. We seek to:

Create a culture that fosters teamwork, eliminates “group think” and encourages the open exchange of ideas and excellence in all we do 
Remove any internal barriers and bias which may hinder performance or progression of our people 
Foster an inclusive work environment where every individual is valued, their talents are fully utilised and they have the opportunity to maximise their contribution to the firm 
Create a culture of accountability to ensure we embed a mindset of diversity in everything we do 

Nomura is committed to fostering an inclusive work environment, where our people can and do realise their full potential. Our employee networks, our inclusive benefits plans and our workplace practices and policies are all designed to help us achieve this goal.

×




Our Business
Built to value ideas


Intellectual Capital in Action 
Get a unique perspective from our international experts – Connecting Markets East & West.









Nomura provides investment banking services across the Asia Pacific region. We have a client-centric model and continue to make significant enhancements to our investment banking platform, global distribution, structuring expertise and product capabilities.
We continue to significantly increase our global footprint where we believe we have a competitive advantage and can best serve our clients, employees and shareholders. By putting our clients at the center of everything we do, we provide high value-added solutions and contribute to economic growth as Asia’s global investment bank.

Investment Banking

Global Markets

Corporate Infrastructure









Annisa Lee 
Head of Flow Credit Analysis, Asia ex-Japan










Kevin Gaynor 
Global Head of Asset Allocation Strategy










George Goncalves 
Head of US Rates Strategy










Selim Toker 
Hedging Balance Sheet Risk










Nick Kenworthy 
Head of Research Sales, UK










Richard Byworth 
Head of Multi Strategy Sales, Asia ex-Japan












Investment Banking

Our Investment Banking Division provides a variety of advisory and capital-raising solutions to corporations, financial institutions, governments and public-sector organizations around the world. Our global teams act as geographic, product and industry specialists.
Corporate Finance Advisory: Sector and country coverage professionals are critical in identifying and analyzing deal opportunities and managing client relationships. The ideas generated can have a tremendous impact on a sector.
Global Finance and Capital Raising: Global Finance is a combination of product experts, who are focused on providing tailor-made client solutions in debt or equity financing. The group works closely with Corporate Finance, M&A and Global Markets to originate structure and execute deals across the globe.
We deliver Asia to our clients – accessing deep pools of liquidity and dynamic growth markets, with cross-border collaborations in M&A, DCM, ECM, and solutions businesses.

×


Global Markets

Nomura's Global Markets Division handles client transactions for financial institutions, corporates, governments and investment funds around the world. We act as market makers, trading in fixed income and equity securities, including currencies, interest rates and credit in cash, derivatives and structured products. We have taken market-leading positions across the globe by leveraging the strength of our talent, client relationships and technology.
By developing strong relationships with our client base through consistent interaction, independent advice and pre-eminent access to Asia, we have built a powerful global franchise across interest rates, currency and credit products. Our client services cover both high-volume flow products and carefully tailored structured solutions. We have adapted to the changing financial landscape to build a client centric focus differentiated by innovation, electronic and service excellence and market-leading derivatives capabilities.

×


Corporate Infrastructure

Our Corporate Infrastructure Division is what underpins the success of the entire organization. It is internationally renowned and structured to deliver a world-class client service. We rely on it to build and support the business, helping us deliver innovative financial solutions that set Nomura apart in the global marketplace.
In our highly competitive and fast-paced industry, strong infrastructure teams are fundamental to our success. Work in these areas (Compliance, Finance, Operations or Technology) with us and you will operate at the forefront of your field, as well as gaining a valuable insight into how Nomura operates on a global scale.

×



Our People
Talented people to drive our business forward


Nomura believes in harnessing the ambition of talented and intelligent people to drive our business forward. Our graduates' entrepreneurial spirits are helping us to realize our strategy to become Asia's global investment bank. Hear how Nomura impressed them, their experiences as interns and graduates and the evolution of their roles and responsibilities since joining.
For top tips on how to prepare for interviews please also visit the Interview Skills section.





Charmaine Chong
Investment Banking

Charmaine Chong - Investment Banking, Singapore


Graduated in Liberal Arts with a focus in Economics, Vassar College, USA, 2011

For most liberal arts students, investment banking may not seem like a natural career choice. I was initially skeptical as well. Although an analyst position provides the fast-paced working environment with high expectations I was looking for, I was concerned that my limited finance knowledge compared to students with a business-related degree would hold me back. However, as I went through the recruiting process, I realized that investment banks are looking for more than just the right answers to technical questions – they also value the diversity in thought and depth of communication and interpersonal skills that liberal arts graduates can bring to the table.
While the first few weeks as an intern or analyst can be daunting, especially for those without a finance background, Nomura has structured a training program that accelerates the learning curve. With a comprehensive curriculum and warm and consistent mentoring to support one’s learning, the only other necessity is a passion to improve and to deliver high-quality work.
There were two things I was greatly appreciative of within days of joining Nomura: the strong team spirit and the willingness of my colleagues to consider all opinions and ideas. Even as an intern, I was integrated immediately into and considered part of the team. My responsibilities and contributions grew along with my capabilities, regardless of my title.
Having served in both capital markets and corporate finance sides of investment banking, I’m grateful for the in-depth exposure to a wide variety of financial products and companies across Asia. In my current role as an analyst in the corporate finance team, I’m constantly juggling different deals with different clients, deliverables and deadlines – what excites me especially is when the work my team produces benefits our clients’ growth strategies.
Nomura continues to expand rapidly. Building on our significant momentum, we continue to generate new business opportunities. This is the place for graduates looking for a stimulating and intellectually challenging environment and who want to be an integral part of an exciting future.

×




Christopher Read
Corporate Infrastructure

Christopher Read - Finance


BSc in Banking, Finance & Management, Loughborough University

The opportunity to be given real work and responsibility from day one impressed me and was a key reason I applied to Nomura. As an intern in the Fixed Income Product Control team I was responsible for producing daily profit and loss statements, which included reconciling various data feeds, comparing desk estimates and communicating any discrepancies to the traders. This gave me great exposure across the desk and with the traders. As I became more confident and efficient, I was given additional products and traders to cover.
Nomura excels at providing real opportunities to interns and graduates. In the current economic climate there are many challenges but also opportunities to get more involved. I have increasingly been given more responsibility, while some of my friends are still doing similar roles to when they started. 
The graduate training included technical and soft skills sessions. The soft skills "Delivering powerful presentations" training was particularly valuable - our pitches were recorded and then replayed, which was really helpful and informative.
My responsibilities have steadily grown since joining the rotational graduate program. I have been heavily involved in several insightful pieces of analysis for senior management. In Cost Management & Analytics I developed an internal cost allocation process, improved the content and insight of internal Management Information (MI) and worked on delivering several cost saving initiatives. In the Regulatory Reporting team I have taken ownership of several key processes and reports and recently played a key project role in the delivery and reporting of the new CRDIV Liquidity Coverage Ratio (LCR) to the UK Regulator (PRA).
My top tip for future interns is flexibility and networking. You have to be flexible in your approach to work. Be ready to take on new projects and tasks that may be outside your remit. Be proactive and don’t be afraid to challenge the status quo.

×





Elisabeth Kilbane
Global Markets

Elisabeth Kilbane, Global Markets, New York


Majored in Economics at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology (MIT)

Route to Nomura: The summer before my senior year of college, I interned with Nomura and at the end of the summer, I received and accepted an offer of full-time employment.
To prepare for my interview, I read up on current events and the markets, and I considered in advance the personal experiences that had led me to applying. I also researched Nomura itself, so that I understood the firm’s role in the global finance landscape. My advice is to stay calm during the interview. You may be asked some technical questions that are difficult to prepare for ahead of time. Give the questions your best shot, but don't let them overwhelm you or cloud the rest of your interview. 
During my internship, I was given the opportunity to work on projects with very senior people. I was trusted to take responsibility for projects and expected to contribute in a meaningful way right from the start. Because of this, there were high expectations for development throughout the program, and I felt as though my mentors were pushing me towards goals in my product knowledge. This challenging yet supportive environment proved to be an excellent learning experience, and I learned more in my summer with Nomura than I had in any previous internship. 
Having never worked in financial markets before, I was very unsure of what to expect going into my summer internship. I walked into training knowing only the basics of finance, and I expected the experience to be overwhelming and highly competitive. However, I found my peers and mentors to be extremely helpful throughout my summer at Nomura. 
I believe the key to a successful internship is to express a genuine interest in the products. Interns should work to understand to the best of their ability, the products of the desks they rotate through. You can demonstrate your knowledge by showing real curiosity and asking intelligent questions. While meeting a lot of people is of course important, the value of this is increased tremendously by having high quality conversations and leaving a positive impression on those you meet.

×





Ifiok Ekwere
Investment Banking

Ifiok Ekwere - Investment Banking, London


Joint Honors Bachelors degree in Biology and Management, Imperial College London

What impressed me about Nomura was the structure of the internship program. From a non-finance background I was keen to complete an internship in a bank where I would have the opportunity to learn as much as I could about the industry and to understand where my skill set would be best suited. Before the internship I thought I would be most suited to an Equities role, however, rotating between Equities and Fixed Income helped me realize my skill set and interests were much better suited to a role in Fixed Income. 
As an intern my typical day started at around 6.30am. I was responsible for summarizing key points in our trading meeting and updating the team. I attended desk-specific meetings to organise the day’s tasks before the markets opened for trading. After trading, I would review the days' trades with the settlement teams to ensure they had been booked correctly. On the FX Sales desk I also built an Excel model that was used as a platform to structure sales strategies.
As an Associate my typical day starts around 7.30am with a morning meeting call. I then put together a summary of the news highlights from Bloomberg relating to the companies that we manage in our loan portfolio. During earnings season, I will put together earnings summaries and circulate these to the relevant teams and people within the bank. If there is a 'live' deal being assessed by the desk, there will often be a series of meetings with colleagues across the Investment Banking, Finance and Risk Management divisions to discuss and analyse the merits of the deal before it is sent to the necessary approval committees. 
A highlight for me was the Management Buy-Out of Iceland Foods – it was the first deal I was responsible for from start to finish and it was a thrill to see it announced in the news upon completion!
As a graduate I have been involved in a number of well-known EMEA / Americas transactions. I find the investment banking industry fascinating and am looking forward to gaining more experience and progressing at an even faster pace with my career over the next few years.

×




Jaap Tanke
Global Markets

Jaap Tanke - Global Markets, London


Masters in Finance, University of Amsterdam

Route to Nomura: After I graduated, I immediately joined the Global Markets summer internship program and at the end of the program I received an offer to join full time.
What initially impressed me about Nomura was the open culture and how approachable the people were.

During my internship I rotated between the Managed Accounts desk in Equities and the Corporate Equity derivatives team. In the first rotation, I assisted the team with small tasks as they were in the middle of launching a new fund. In my second rotation I learned how to price different option structures with in-house software researched specific stocks and contributed towards different slides of pitch book presentations.
The intern training was very helpful. The Bloomberg and Thomson Reuters training ensured I was up to speed to complete tasks while on the desk. There were a lot of networking opportunities and we also contributed towards raising money for the charity Rainbow Trust by organizing different activities for employees to sponsor the interns. The cross divisional activities ensured we met with fellow interns across the firm.
As a graduate I had immediate exposure to clients (after completing my FCA qualification). The immediate exposure allowed me to build key relationships which have resulted in doing day to day business with some top accounts now. My focus at the moment is to become a specialist in one specific product, in order to eventually become the go-to person for my clients in this product.
My top advice for an intern is to explore the firm; sit with different desks and divisions as this will give you a very good overview of the different positions available at a global investment bank. In addition, try to add value on top of your main day to day tasks; this will demonstrate that you are eager and a hard worker.

×




Joyce Su
Global Markets

Joyce Su - Global Markets, Hong Kong


Graduated with an MA in Mathematics of Finance, Columbia University, 2010

I returned to Asia after working and studying in the US for a number of years. What motivated me to join Nomura when I moved back is its reputation - it's the best bank in Asia, with a growing global reach. The people here also influenced my decision: from my first interview they gave me their time and expertise so that I could find the best role to match my skill set. They wanted me to maximize my career potential, as well as match me to an area that would benefit them - it was a two-way decision.
What sets Nomura above other investment banks is the culture. The rapidly expanding global operations are making us a leader in the industry, and this momentum gives the bank an entrepreneurial feel. It's a place where smart people work together and encourage each other to develop their own creative ideas.
I am part of the Prime Services team, financing and structuring hedge funds for our sales people and traders. From day one I participated in so many aspects of the business and my manager was keen to get my input and opinion on our projects. In fact, he still is! I've learnt never to be afraid of bringing ideas to the table, because the managers here always give you the chance to excel. If your ideas are good, they will use them.
I'm looking forward to forging a successful career at Nomura. It's a place where you can learn and absorb knowledge quickly, and use it to move up to higher levels of responsibility. If you have the right attitude and a passion for investment banking, this is the place to be.

×




Sameer Rahman
Global Markets

Sameer Rahman - Global Markets, Singapore


Graduated in Mathematics, University of New South Wales.  MBA in International Business, University of Technology, Sydney

I never doubted that I wanted to work in investment banking, simply because the nature of the industry is such that it challenges you to push yourself to do the best you can. Joining this industry, I knew I would be working with (or competing against) some of the brightest people around which motivates me to go the extra mile.
I was attracted to Nomura because of its strong business culture, positive team environment and, most importantly, the excellent opportunities afforded to young graduates such as myself. We are growing at an incredible pace and it’s truly an exciting place to be, if one looks at the footprint we already have in this industry and what we are striving to achieve.
From the beginning, the 6 week graduate training program in London helped us strengthen our knowledge across different asset classes as well as forge meaningful relationships with our peers from the different offices across the world. It gave us the base to settle in immediately once we joined our desk.  
I was trusted to cover clients and asked to come up with trade ideas very early on. My manager was very encouraging and it gave me the confidence to learn and grow very quickly. Looking back on the past year and putting everything in perspective, joining Nomura was one of the best decisions I made. 

×




Sapna Aeri
Corporate Infrastructure

Sapna Aeri - Technology, London


Bachelors Computer Science degree, City University London

Route to Nomura: I took a third year industrial placement with Lehman Brothers, which later resulted in a role at Nomura.
I was impressed by Nomura as it appeared to be constantly growing and adapting. This meant I would be involved in new projects and new and evolving technology to cope with the greater global demand. This was (and still is) an exciting prospect!
As an intern I gained vast exposure to the variety of roles I could pursue. I attended networking events, panel discussions and lunch & learn sessions. The thought of working in an investment bank was initially quite intimidating, however I was surprised at how freely I was able to interact with colleagues of varying seniority, allowing me to build a strong network and experience a range of outlooks and perspectives.
The graduate training was really useful. With a background in IT, I had limited understanding of banking, so it was useful to gain a more detailed understanding. We have had further product specific training and personal development sessions since then, which is great for understanding how you are being perceived by others and how to present yourself in different situations.
Every day you learn something new; I could be holding discussions with the desk, brokers or development team, or discussing new ideas, projects and enhancements to our current systems. My responsibilities span from kicking off and looking after projects for the desk, managing system upgrades and testing, as well as ensuring trade flows are being handled correctly. I am learning about option trading directly from the desk and the management of the trades through testing on our FX options platform. As banking evolves and changes, I have the opportunity to learn about the new technology on offer, scope out new requirements and see the projects through from start to end.
Since joining as a graduate I have progressed to the position of Senior Business Analyst within FX Options technology; I have led the delivery of global high profile projects for both regulatory and business purposes and I have improved the quality of deliverables by implementing a thorough suite of testing. 

×




Sayaka Azuma
Global Markets

Sayaka Azuma - Global Markets, London


Graduated in Economics, Kobe University

After studying Economics at university I developed a passion for finance; investment banking seemed like the perfect place for me to explore the industry further. For me, Nomura was the best choice. It's famous in Japan, not only for being at the forefront of banking but also for its hard-work ethic and dynamic culture.
In my time here I have seen the fusing of traditional and new, with Nomura's acquisition of Lehman Brothers. This has formed a culture that encourages new thinking based on strong foundations, and that makes it a really interesting place to work.
As an execution trader, I receive and execute orders from our London office for Japanese stocks. I can win money very quickly, and lose it too, which makes my job really exciting. Each time I succeed, it makes me want more. That is what drives me to come to work every day. Being in constant contact with my colleagues in London also makes me feel part of an international business, not a Japanese bank. I'm not sure how many other places could offer that.
What makes Nomura an exciting place to be right now is the change we are going through. If you have ambition and drive, you can use those talents to get involved in this change process, grow the company, and really boost your career.

×





Yuta Arndt Osada
Global Markets

Yuta Arndt Osada - Global Markets,Tokyo


Keio University

I joined Nomura because you get a lot of responsibility from a very early stage, and everyone works together as a team to meet client needs.
My typical day starts with a morning meeting from 7:10am to share information and have discussions on the stock price from the previous day. We start calling clients from 8:00am with the information from the morning meeting.
It is always extremely busy until 9:00am as many clients prefer to be called before the market opens in order to hear the information and be prepared for the initial reaction of stocks.
After the market opens I continue to talk to clients or go back to the Analysts to have further discussions and looking at the initial stock reactions.
From 12:00pm I usually join meetings with clients or sometime corporates to hear what clients are currently interested in.
At about 3:00pm after the market closes, we often have equity deals, which makes it extremely busy again. I start calling clients to notify them of the deal and arrange road show meetings.
At 5:00pm, if a deal is launched, I join a meeting with the company. Otherwise I am usually preparing for the next day’s morning meeting or discussing stocks with our Analysts, after which I leave the office.
What sets Nomura apart from the other banks is the spirit to work together globally as a team to satisfy client needs all times. I joined the firm because of this and this is what I think differentiates us from others, and what makes it a very good place to work in.

×






Programs
We’re looking to recruit individuals who are motivated


Corporate infrastructure

Global Markets

Investment Banking

Full-time Opportunities

Internship




Our corporate infrastructure is what underpins the success of the entire organization. It is internationally renowned and structured to deliver a world-class client service. We rely on it to build and support the business, helping us deliver innovative financial solutions that set Nomura apart in the global marketplace. In our highly competitive and fast-paced industry, strong infrastructure teams are fundamental to our success. Work in these areas with us and you will operate at the forefront of your field, as well as gaining a valuable insight into how Nomura operates on a global scale.
Corporate consists of 10 diverse divisions that all partner with the business to ensure we run smoothly day-to-day:



Information Technology

Information Technology leverages state-of-the-art IT and risk management systems to develop new applications and achieve truly cutting-edge standards. They stay at the forefront of technology and its applications for clients, partners, regulators and suppliers.



Operations

The Operations division provides the support and control infrastructure that enables the Firm to develop and deliver financial products throughout the world. Working with the Sales, Trading and Information Technology divisions, Operations professionals are responsible for the management and execution of transactions in a manner which maximizes profitability and minimizes risk. Our goal is to provide innovative and efficient approaches to the systemic investment, liquidity and risk management needs of the Firm's clients.



Finance

The Finance division supports the business through control and advisory financial management services, as well as playing a critical role in supporting the strategy of the Firm. Finance is responsible for delivering key financial information to business areas and overall Firm results, as well as being accountable for delivering financial and capital-related information to regulators.



Corporate Communications

Corporate Communications is responsible for coordinating all our internal and external communications activities, helping to strategically position Nomura as a market-leading investment bank. Communications professionals also assist in safeguarding our corporate reputation by ensuring we maintain a strong internal brand and communication culture.



Audit

Our Audit team performs risk-based audits across the Asia region and provides advisory services to senior management. The team covers all businesses including Global Markets, Investment Banking, Wealth Management, Asset Management, and Merchant Banking.



Human Resources

Human Resources plays a critical role in managing our people, the most important asset of the Firm. Partnering with our clients and managers, Human Resources professionals ensure successful planning and execution of the Firm's human capital initiatives.



Corporate Services

Corporate Services focuses on three main corporate functions: Real Estate, Services and Corporate Security. Real Estate provides a "one-stop shop" service to troubleshoot issues with facilities and critical systems engineering. In addition, Real Estate professionals manage capital works procurement, vendor appointment and management, and lease negotiations and renewals for Nomura premises in the region. Services provides market data and presentation support through Business Information Services and Computer Graphics. Administrative support is also provided through Meeting Services, Mail & Reprographics, Operational Procurement, and Record Retention services. Corporate Security looks after the general safety and security of all the office premises.



Corporate Strategy

Corporate Strategy and Planning contributes to the Firm's growth by identifying and prioritizing business opportunities, evaluating potential investments and investigating strategic partnerships. The team then organize business development meetings with potential partners and acquisition candidates, leading efforts to implement these opportunities.



Legal & Compliance

Legal & Compliance partners all our divisions to support and advance Nomura's businesses and reputation. These professionals work to manage and mitigate any legal or regulatory risks, facing the challenges that come with the region's diverse jurisdictions and dynamically evolving laws and rules.



Risk

The role of Risk Management is to support and influence senior management in the execution of its business strategy. This means acting to increase shareholder returns and optimize the Firm's return on capital, all while ensuring capital adequacy. The Risk Management team works to provide a Firm-wide capital management framework, which takes into account the availability and cost of capital, its effective utilization within and across business lines, and the overall capital adequacy of the Firm. 
Risk Management's key activities include: ensuring transparency and effectively managing market, credit, liquidity, concentration and tail risk within the risk appetite of the Firm, and monitoring the effectiveness of capital utilization through the use of limit structures. There is also a great emphasis on stress testing and risk adjusted returns on capital efficiency measures.





Nomura's Global Markets division handles client transactions for financial institutions, corporates, governments and investment funds around the world. We act as market makers, trading in fixed income and equity securities, including currencies, interest rates and credit in cash, derivatives and structured products. We have taken market-leading positions across the globe by leveraging the strength of our talent, client relationships and technology.
By developing strong relationships with our client base through consistent interaction, independent advice and pre-eminent access to Asia, we have built a powerful global franchise across interest rates, currency and credit products. Our client services are far reaching across volume driven flow products and carefully tailored and structured solutions. 
We have exploited the changing financial landscape to build a client centric focus differentiated by innovation, electronic and service excellence and market leading derivatisation capabilities. 
The Opportunity
If you are fascinated by the markets and their movements, cycles and patterns, then global markets could be for you. You will learn about how the partnership's between the different functions and asset classes which create success for us and our clients. Our success is built on:

Unique intellectual capital of research and structuring
Strategically disciplined coverage model of our sales force
Superior risk taking and market making capabilitie

What will I need?
For an Analyst position you should have or expect a minimum 2.1, Distinction or 3.2 GPA (or equivalent) degree in any discipline. A Masters degree is advantageous but not a requirement. You should be highly numerate and a strong communicator. Fluency in English is essential and fluency in other Asian languages is often for certain roles and locations.
What roles are available?
Sales: Developing and maintaining strong relationships with institutional clients, including pension funds, hedge funds, insurance companies and other corporate clients.
Trading: Assisting traders in buying and selling securities in the secondary market on behalf of clients or the firm; market making and capital commitment.
Research: Collecting, analyzing and assessing industry and company information to assist the research analysts in providing market insight and investment ideas for institutional investors and internal clients.
Structuring: Designing and developing innovative products and strategies for Nomura's clients, in partnership with the trading function, to create a risk management strategy for structured transactions and, together with sales, to create a marketing strategy for our products.


Our investment banking group provides a vast array of advisory and capital-raising solutions to corporations, financial institutions, governments and public-sector organizations around the world. Our global teams act as geographic, product and industry specialists. We deliver Asia to our clients – accessing deep pools of liquidity and dynamic growth markets. We have cross-border collaboration in M&A (Mergers & Acquisitions), DCM (Debt Capital Markets), ECM (Equity Capital Markets), and solutions businesses, and across global sectors such as FIG (Financial Institutions Group), natural resources and power, and financial sponsors.
Corporate Finance Advisory: Sector and country coverage professionals are critical in identifying and analyzing deal opportunities and managing client relationships. The ideas generated can have a tremendous impact on a sector.
Global Finance and Capital Raising: Global Finance is a combination of product experts, who are focused on providing tailor-made client solutions in debt or equity financing. The group works closely with Corporate Finance, M&A, fixed income and equities divisions to originate, structure and execute deals across the globe.
Clients rely on the ingenuity and innovation of our bankers for strategic advice and financial solutions. This combined with our number #1 position in Japan investment banking allows us to deliver Asia’s global investment bank to our clients.
The Opportunity
If it is the challenge and excitement of corporate finance that drives you, then this is the route for you. We will provide you with training so that you have all the functional skills, technical knowledge and tools you will need for an influential career in investment banking. You will become a sector or product expert, working in teams to deliver analyse, market and execute transactions. Through our global network of professionals and our access to Asian markets, we can help deliver unique solutions to our clients.
What's involved? Our program is designed to give you everything you need to join the front rank of global investment bankers. You will begin with an intensive, 6-week development program, which covers accounting, modelling, valuation and deal structuring together with essential client skills. You will find that the emphasis is on practical application so that you can make an immediate impact. Throughout your development, you will be supported by a buddy, mentor, and our dedicated program management team.
What will I need?
For an Analyst position you should have or expect a minimum 2.1 Distinction or 3.2 GPA (or equivalent) degree in any discipline. A Masters degree is advantageous but not a requirement. You should be highly numerate and a strong communicator. Fluency in English is essential and fluency in other Asian languages is often required for certain roles and locations.
For an Associate role, you must have, or be completing an MBA and have at least 2 to 3 years’ relevant work experience and demonstration of a strong sense of commerciality.
What roles are available?
Deal execution: You will work closely with clients and execution teams (lawyers, accountants, consultants and bankers) on mandated transactions, including mergers and acquisitions, divestitures, capital raisings and restructurings.
Client relationship management: We want to see you generating and presenting ideas at client meetings alongside senior bankers.
Strategic analysis: We will train you to produce financial, structural and business risk analysis to support transactions and client presentations.
Have we excited your interest yet? The graduates we take on today are set to enjoy great success. If you're ready to become one of them, click here to get an overview of our business areas and choose the one that suits you.
Take a look at our opportunities to find out more. If you are a final year student, you will be eligible for our full-time program. To join one of our intern programs you will be in your penultimate or junior year of study.



Our Programs

Analyst: You should be pursuing or have recently completed an undergraduate or master’s degree with limited or no work experience
Associate: You should possess, or be currently studying for an MBA with at least 3 years’ full time, continuous and relevant work experience. Opportunities for MBA's are only available in the Investment Banking programs

Our programs start in July/August every year although we do allow earlier start dates, depending on your circumstances. We aim to hire our full time class from our internship program and therefore do not always have full time vacancies open.



Program
Timing
Location
Eligibility
Application Deadline




2017 Global Markets - Full time Graduate
July - August
Hong Kong, Singapore
Students graduating in 2017
25th September, 2016


2017 Investment Banking - Full time Graduate
July - August
Hong Kong, Singapore
Students graduating in 2017
25th September, 2016


2018 Graduate Program
February 2018
Analyst positions in Investment Banking & Global Markets, Sydney
Students graduating in 2018
12pm, 6th April, 2017





An internship with Nomura is your opportunity to see just what you could be part of. You will get first-hand experience of the possibilities a career in banking could bring you, and get a feel for our culture.
We aim to give our interns the same level of exposure as a first-year Analyst or Associate. That means you'll work as a full member of the team, participating in team meetings, potentially meeting clients, forming effective working relationships and showing a real commitment to our goals and values. You will start with an initial orientation and training program to equip you with the fundamental skills and toolkit needed to succeed and, during the course of your internship, you can expect to work closely with a buddy and have regular contact with senior mentors. This, coupled with continual on-the-job training, regular senior business presentations, social events and networking opportunities, will allow you to see what makes us an exciting proposition in the investment banking world.
Our intern programs are an integral component of our full time recruiting efforts and are a two-way assessment process. While we evaluate your potential and suitability for a career at Nomura, you are also assessing your own fit for investment banking. At the start of the program, you will set objectives with your manager and then participate in a mid-term and final performance review. At the end of the program, offers are extended to strong performers to return to Nomura after graduation.
Our Programs
We have internship opportunities on the following programs:



Program
Timing
Location
Eligibility
Application Deadline




2017 Investment Banking - Summer Analyst
June – August
Hong Kong, Singapore
Penultimate year or junior students graduating in 2018
30th October, 2016


2017 Global Markets - Summer Analyst
June – August
Hong Kong, Singapore
Penultimate year or junior students graduating in 2018
30th October, 2016


2017 Corporate Services - Summer Analyst
June – August
Hong Kong
Penultimate year or junior students graduating in 2018
15th November, 2016


2017/18 Australia Summer Program
December – February
Analyst positions in Investment Banking, Sydney
Penultimate year or junior students graduating in 2019
12pm, 27th July, 2017










News & Campus Events
The graduates are set to enjoy great success

Campus Events
We are always keen to meet talented and ambitious students at events we run on campus. These include company presentations, skills sessions, careers fairs and networking events across various universities in Europe. Nomura campus events provide students with an opportunity to meet with business representatives and the graduate recruitment team, where we can provide you with the business knowledge and application and interview advice you need to succeed. 
Find out which events we have scheduled in your region.
Recent Nomura News & Awards


Finance Asia Japan Achievement Awards 2014/15:


Best Investment Bank
Best ECM House

Global Finance Best Investment Bank Awards 2014:


Best Investment Bank Asia Pacific
Best Investment Bank in Japan

Thomson Reuters Deal Watch Awards 2014


House of the Year - Nomura Securities

Institutional Investor 2014


No. 1 All-Japan Research team 
No. 1 FX Research in All-America Fixed Income Research Survey



Nikkei Analyst Survey 2015


No. 1 overall in Fixed Income Analyst / Economist survey 

The Banker - 2014 Deals Of The YearNomura wins two awards in The Banker Deals of the Year: 


Best SSA Deal of the Year in Europe: Ireland’s 5bn Euro bond
Best Corporate Deal of the Year in Asia-Pacific: Softbank’s dual tranche JPY370bn domestic bond offering

Laura Atherley, Global Head of Senior Relationship Management named one of the top 100 Most Influential Women by Financial News 2014.
Steve Ashley, Senior Managing Director of Nomura Holdings, Inc., Joint Head of Wholesale Division and Global Markets Head, has been voted no.4 in the Sales and Trading category in Financial News’ annual list of the most influential people in the European capital markets.







Apply Now
See what opportunities are available to you
Apply Here

Whether you are just entering the industry or an experienced professional looking for your next exciting opportunity, working at Nomura is a unique opportunity to make a difference in the industry in a way that is unprecedented. We have quite a number of roles for which we are currently accepting applications and we invite you to go through our list of global opportunities and send your CV to us.
Please click here to review current opportunities.



Application Process

Application FAQs

Interview Tips




You will need to apply through our online application form. We will also ask you to upload a CV and cover letter. We accept applications from all degree disciplines - although you will need a minimum 2.1 degree (or equivalent). While your degree subject doesn't matter, you must be numerate, have an interest in finance and a desire to work in the investment banking industry.
Filling in the form
The application form is your chance to make a strong first impression. Before completing it, make sure that you:

Research the business area that you feel best corresponds to your skill set and interests, and your motivation for applying to this area. 
Apply to the correct program (the Analyst program for Masters or Bachelor students, or the Associate program for MBA students with a minimum of 2-3 years work experience).
Tailor your cover letter to Nomura. Be original. 
Check your grammar and spelling carefully before you submit your application.
Have good examples of our core competencies, such as leadership, academic achievement, national and school-specific awards and work experience.

If you’re applying for an Analyst position (full-time or internship), you will also be required to take an online numerical and logical reasoning test as part of the initial application process.
Once you have submitted your application, it will be reviewed by Graduate Recruitment team and the business and, if you are shortlisted, you will be invited to attend a first round interview.
You will typically have 2 or 3 first round interviews with junior business representatives (Analyst or Associate). Interviews are generally competency-based. Successful candidates will be shortlisted for further interviews with senior business representatives (Executive/Managing Director). Interviews may contain competency based questions but you should also expect technical questions and be prepared to explain your interests and motivations. Interviews may be conducted face to face or via telephone or video conference. You may also be interviewed in a language other than English, depending on the location and business you have applied for.
You should be prepared to answer questions relating to our competencies:

Problem solving/Analytics
Team skills/Professionalism
Leadership
Initiative
Communication





Which divisions are currently hiring? 

Investment banking, global markets and corporate infrastructure. Most of our opportunities are in Hong Kong although we do have limited roles in Singapore, India and China. 



Does Nomura offer internship programs?

Yes, we offer a 10 week summer program which runs from December to February in Australia and June to August in the rest of Asia. To be eligible for the internship program you should be in your penultimate or junior year of study. Please click here for further information.



Which academic qualifications must I have?

We encourage applications from all disciplines and look for candidates who have, or expect to achieve a minimum 2.1, Distinction or 3.2 GPA (or equivalent) in their degree program. It is essential that you're numerate, with an interest in finance and a desire to work in the investment banking industry.



May I apply to more than one division?

Yes. You can apply for up to three divisions. However, you should do as much research as possible beforehand. It's important to understand which business area would best match your skill set and interests. We are looking for applicants with motivation and we will expect you to be able to discuss your choice, and show both enthusiasm for, and knowledge of the various roles.



What should I expect during the interview process? 

If you're selected for first round interviews you can expect to have 2 or 3 one-on-one interviews with junior employees which may be conducted face to face of via telephone or video conference. These interviews will typically be competency based. Successful candidates will be shortlisted for a further 3 or 4 interviews which will be conducted by senior business representatives and may be more technical in nature, possibly involving a case study or language test.



What is Nomura looking for in candidates?

We are looking for candidates with a true interest in and commitment to the financial services industry. Academic qualifications and previous work experience are important but we are also looking for you to demonstrate other qualities achieved through extra-curricular activities such as interpersonal skills, teamwork ability and motivation. We assess all candidates using a range of core competencies and we look for evidence of these in your CV/resume, cover letter and throughout the selection process. 



Competency
Examples




Professional presence
Communication skills, attitude, assertiveness, self confidence and a high level of maturity


Commitment and drive
Bias to action, resourcefulness, work ethic, drive to excel and tenaciousness


Problem solving and analytical skills
Analytical approach, logic, commercial intuition, quantitative ability and natural intelligence


Planning and execution
Attention to detail, results orientation, creative approach and time management skills


Collaboration
Relationship-building, team orientation, diplomacy and respect


Leadership
Relationship-building, team orientation, diplomacy and respect






I've been accepted for an interview. Do you have any tips?

We want you to do your very best at interview. So take a look at our section on interview tips. In this section, you can complete a mock interview and read our guide on interview etiquette.



When are the application deadlines? 

The dates below are final deadlines, but because we review applications on a rolling basis, the sooner you submit your application, the more chance you'll have.



Program
Timing
Location
Eligibility
Application Deadline




2016 Graduate Program
July 2016
Analyst positions in Global Markets across Hong Kong and Singapore
Students graduating in 2016
25 October 2015


2016 Semester Program – Investment Banking
October 2015
Analyst positions in Hong Kong
Students graduating in 2017
6 September 2015


2016 Semester Program – Global Markets
October 2015
Analyst positions in Hong Kong
Students graduating in 2016
13 September 2015


2016 Summer Program
June – August
Analyst positions in Corporate Infrastructure, Global Markets and Investment Banking. Associate positions limited to Investment Banking only
Penultimate year or junior students graduating in 2017
15 November 2015


2016/17 Australia Summer Program
December – February
Analyst positions in Investment Banking
Penultimate year or junior students graduating in 2018
July 2016, exact date to be confirmed






Will Nomura sponsor work authorization? 

Yes, we will sponsor those students we offer, but the government immigration office will ultimately make the final decision as to whether this will be granted.



Will I be required to complete online testing?

No, there are no online tests. You will need to complete an online application form and upload a CV and cover letter, which will then be CV screened. If you are successful, we will contact you for first round interviews.






How to tackle a case study

Glossary

Interview Steps

Mock Interview




First round interviews (for Investment Banking and Global Markets) will involve a case study. Case study interviews are designed to show us your problem-solving skills and analytical thinking. We will also be looking at how you present yourself and how good your communication skills are under pressure.
Why use case studies?
We use case study interviews because they provide us with insights into your thought processes. Problem solving is often independent of any particular subject expertise you may have and we want to see how you would tackle any of a very wide range of potential case study questions. We are interested in your expertise in general business, your ability to apply your formal education and work experience in an analytical and creative way, and your raw intelligence.
What kind of questions should I expect?
Often a case study is business-related, but it could touch on anything - the question is not designed to test any previously acquired knowledge or experience. You will be asked to prepare an exercise from information given to you when you arrive at the interview. You will have between 45 and 60 minutes to read the data and compile your notes. You will then be asked to make recommendations. Remember, there are no right answers. You should consider all lines of argument and then present one as your chosen opinion, mentioning why you discarded the other possibilities.
How to do well

Practice extensively beforehand. Research case study examples on the internet and use them to build your experience. 
Ensure that you are able to present your pitch concisely and articulately. You will have a very limited time to get the main points across before the interviewer starts asking you questions on your rationale.
Listen carefully to the question. If you like, repeat it back to your interviewer to make sure you have understood fully.
Don't jump into your answer immediately. Take a moment to collect your thoughts, and get ready. 
Remember that we are not looking for a 'correct' answer. It is the route you have taken to reach your answer that is important to us. 
Ask questions. Asking the right questions will be key to proving that you have the analytical skills we expect. The interview is meant to be interactive.
Construct a logical framework with which to explore the critical issues of the case.
Prioritize the issues and objectives. Don't get bogged down trying to deal with every aspect.
Don't be afraid to think outside the box. Creativity is seen as a major asset at Nomura.

Further reading
http://www.wikijob.co.uk/wiki/case-study

http://www.casequestions.com



Asset and Liability Management (ALM): the practice of managing risks that arise due to mismatches between assets and liabilities of the financial institution.
Bond: an instrument of indebtedness of the bond issuer to the holders. It is a debt security, under which the issuer owes the holders a debt and, depending on the terms of the bond, is obliged to pay them interest (the coupon) and/or to repay the principal at a later date, termed the maturity date
CAGR: “Compound Annual Growth Rate” – the year-over-year percentage growth rate of an investment over a specified period of time 
Capex: Acronym meaning Capital Expenditures, that are funds used by a company to acquire or upgrade physical assets such as property, industrial buildings or equipment. This type of outlay is made by companies to maintain or increase the scope of their operations
D&A: Acronym meaning Depreciation and Amortization, a category of expenditure by which a company gradually records the loss in value of a tangible (Depreciation) and Intangible (Amortization) asset
Deleveraging: Reduction of the leverage ratio, or the percentage of debt in the balance sheet of a single economic entity, such as a household or a firm.
Discount rate: The interest rate used in discounted cash flow analysis to determine the present value of future cash flows. The discount rate takes into account the time value of money (the idea that money available now is worth more than the same amount of money available in the future because it could be earning interest) and the risk or uncertainty of the anticipated future cash flows (which might be less than expected).
EBITDA: Acronym meaning Earnings Before Interest, Taxes, Depreciation and Amortization
EBIT: Acronym meaning Earnings Before Interest and Taxes
ETF: Exchange traded funds. An exchange traded fund is an investment fund traded on stock exchanges, just like stocks. An ETF holds assets such as stocks, commodities or bonds, and trades close to its net asset value over the course of the trading day.
EV: “Enterprise Value” – Equal to Equity Value plus Net Debt (or minus Net Cash)
FCF: “Free Cash Flow” – Measure of cash generation used in fundamental valuation of a business. Equal to EBIT x (1 - tax rate) + depreciation and amortisation - changes in working capital - capex 
Forward interest rates: An interest rate that is specified now for a loan that will occur at a specified future date. As with current interest rates, forward interest rates include a term structure that shows the different forward rates offered to loans of different maturities.
Hedge: an investment made in order to reduce the risk of adverse price movements in a security, by taking an offsetting position in a related security, such as options or short sales.
LTM: Acronym meaning Last Twelve Months
IRR: Acronym meaning internal rate of return. The IRR corresponds to the rate of return on an investment. The IRR of a project is the discount rate that will give it a net present value of zero
Market Cap: Market capitalisation or market cap is a value of a corporation as determined by the market price of its common stock (shares). It is calculated by multiplying the number of outstanding shares by the current market price of the share
Market liquidity: an asset's ability to be sold without causing a significant movement in the price and with minimum loss of value.
Opex: Acronym meaning Operating Expenditures, a category of expenditure that a business incurs as a result of performing its normal business operations 
Payout ratio: The amount of earnings paid out in dividends to shareholders
Shareholder loan: an instrument used to distribute cash to shareholders while minimising a company’s tax liability. Not typically included within net debt 
Swap: highly liquid financial derivative instruments in which two parties agree to exchange interest rate cash flows, based on a specified notional amount from a fixed rate to a floating rate (or vice versa) or from one floating rate to another.
Swaption: An option granting its owner the right but not the obligation to enter into an underlying interest rate swap. A payer swaption gives the owner of the swaption the right to enter into a swap where they pay the fixed leg and receive the floating leg. A receiver swaption gives the owner of the swaption the right to enter into a swap in which they will receive the fixed leg, and pay the floating leg.
Ultimate forward rate (UFR): the theoretical forward interest rate to which forward rates converge. 
Yield to maturity: Discount rate at which the sum of all future cash flows from the bond (coupons and principal) is equal to the price of the bond.


There is no need to be nervous at interview - we want you to do well and to show us your potential and what you can do. Preparation is essential and well prepared candidates are more confident, provide more thorough and focused answers and are therefore more likely to be successful.
Use our step by step guide to ensure you take the time to prepare wisely; the key is to ensure your preparation is carefully planned and focused.

Step 1

Step 2

Step 3

Step 4

Step 5




Focus - Structure and Plan your Preparation
Preparing for, and being interviewed is similar to sitting an exam; you won’t have time to cover everything, instead you will need to identify the key points and focus on the relevant material.
Firstly, you should congratulate yourself in being selected for interview stage and have confidence in your ability. Then, ask yourself the following questions:

What will the interviewers want to know?
                                                
An interview is not an opportunity to divulge everything you know- instead you need to focus on what is relevant to the company and the position you’re applying for
To identify what is most relevant, you will need to fully understand the role, it’s requirements and the key skills and competencies required


How are you going to sell yourself?
                                                
What is your unique selling point? I.e. what sets you apart from the competition?
How do you want the interviewers to remember you after the interview – what key points do you want them to recall?


How will you be assessed?
                                                
You can’t start your preparation until you know what you are preparing for
Read the interview format thoroughly to identify how you will be assessed (i.e. Interviews, case study exercises, and tests). If you’re unsure – ask.


What are the core competencies required for the role?
                                                
Your interview performance and ultimately if you are successful or not, will be dependent on how you perform against core competencies
Identify what are the key competencies required for the role and for the company
What examples do you have to demonstrate each competency? Have you considered examples outside academia (i.e. sports, music, drama, volunteering, charity, mentoring, societies or other extracurricular activities) 
What achievements are you most proud of and why – which competency do they demonstrate?





Interview Questions
Interviewers will use a variety of questions to assess your ability against each competency. Ensure you are familiar with each type of question and how to structure your answers accordingly.
Types of interview questions may include:

Competency based questions
                                                
These require you to provide a real life example to explain how you behaved in a certain situation. Past behaviour is used as an indicator to assess potential future performance
Delivering a structured answer is crucial - research the STAR method to guide you
Top Tip: Ensure your examples are varied and recent (the more recent the past behaviour; the greater the indication of future ability)


Technical questions
                                                
Practice! There are many online resources or books available with practice questions
Questions may include basic accounting, valuation, brain teasers and mental arithmetic
Top tip: Brain teasers – the key is not the answer; it is the how you derive at the answer. The interviewer is assessing your ability to formulate a logical and methodical response


CV, cover letter and application questions
                                                
Ensure you have thoroughly re-read each document and identify any obvious questions
Top tip: Practice articulating your experience in a concise and structured manner out loud (it doesn’t always sound the same as when you practice in your head). 


Industry related questions
                                                
Interviewers will assess your interest, understanding and industry knowledge
Top tip: Form an opinion – digest the information you read and form your own judgment. Use facts and statistics to back up your conclusions





Research
There are a number of readily available resources to help you prepare. Make sure you fully utilise all resources available to you. These may include:

Online resources: Company website, press releases, annual reports, research publications, social media and online forums
School career services and recruitment events 
Networks – academic Staff, alumni, peers, family and friends – even if they do not have a financial services background, they can help you practice questions 



Your Questions
An interview is a two way process. It is an opportunity for you to assess if the company, role and culture is right for you. You will be given time to ask questions at the end of the interview, so you should ensure you use this time wisely. 

Plan questions to ask in advance - ensure they are relevant, well-thought-out and to the point
Show you’ve done your research and use the opportunity to demonstrate your interest



Plan the Interview Day
Preparing as much as possible in advance of your interview day will remove many of the inevitable nerves associated with the process.

Before the interview:
                                                
Dress professionally. Plan you outfit the day before and ensure you wear corporate attire
Be Punctual. Plan your route and account for delays in public transport
Aim to arrive 15 minutes before your interview start time. Contact us if problems arise and ensure you have noted the name and contact details of who to contact should this happen
Take a notebook, a pen (that works) and a calculator. Take a copy of your CV and application form
Remember: Be polite to everyone you meet, your interview begins as soon as you walk through the door of the building ore recent the past behaviour; the greater the indication of future ability)


During the Interview:
                                                
Ensure your mobile phone is turned off
Greet your interviewer(s) with a firm handshake. Remember their name(s)
Maintain eye contact with your interviewer(s) and be aware of your body language – sit upright, don’t fidget and smile!
Listen carefully to questions you are asked. If you are unclear about anything, ask for clarification
Be honest. Back up your answers with real examples. If you exaggerate or lie it will show up in pre-employment checks
Relax - whether you are successful or not, the interview is a valuable learning experience. Make sure you get something out of it.
Close the interview – thank your interviewer for their time. If you’ve enjoyed the experience and you look forward to hearing about the next steps – tell us


After your Interview:
                                                
Be responsive. Following the interview, go back to your recruiter and continue to build a relationship
If you are offered a position it is unprofessional to renege (to accept and then later decline). This could be the first impression you create in the industry - you never know what the future holds









Q: Tell me about yourself

This is one of the most popular interview questions. It allows the interviewer to assess how you react in an unstructured situation and you answer provides an insight to what you think is most important.
Tip – focus on what will be of most interest to the interviewers. Ensure your answer is structured, brief and highlights your most important achievements.
Follow up questions may include:

Why did you choose your place of study? 
What courses have you most / least enjoyed and why?
Talk me through your internship experiences
What are you interests and hobbies (outside academic)? 
What are the most important things to you in a job?




Q: Why Banking?

We look for people who have a strong interest in investment banking. Interview Questions will determine how motivated you are and your rationale behind your decisions.

Why do you want to work in investment banking?
What do you think an Analyst does on a typical day?
Why are you interested in this division?
Where do you see yourself in five years? Ten years?
Explain the financial crisis 
If I gave you a million dollars today, how would you invest your money?
Which business publications do you read and why?




Q: Why Nomura?

We want to employ graduates who are passionate about joining Nomura and representing our brand

Why do you want to work for Nomura? 
What differentiates us from our competitors?
What is the share price of Nomura today?
What do you hope to get out of a job?
What other banks are you interviewing with?




Q: Skills

Your interviewer’s want to understand what sets you apart from the competition - sell yourself.

Why should we hire you? 
What skills have you got that make you suited to the role?
What are your strengths/development areas?
What is your greatest achievement and why?




Competency Questions

Show us proof that you are the kind of graduate we are looking for. Give concrete examples from any aspect of your life that show where you have personally made a difference.

Tell me about a time when you were creative
Tell me about a time when you had to manage conflicting priorities
Tell me about when you have missed an important deadline
What has been your biggest failure, professional or personal - and what did you learn?
Describe an occasion when you have had difficulties working in a team
What is the biggest risk you have ever taken?
How would you deal with a difficult client that puts you under pressure?
If a client told you that they wanted to improve their portfolio performance in the next 12 months, what would you suggest as potential strategies










Apply Here
Apply Here



Google Plus


Linkedin


YouTUBE


Twitter


































JCTY News
































Skip to content





Thursday, August 3, 2017






 

 



 












 









										Cardinal Health Tops Fiscal Q4 Street Marks On EPS and Revenues									
Cardinal Health, distributor of healthcare products to hospitals, clinics and others, Wednesday reported fiscal Q4 results ended June 30 which beat expectations and issued downside... 











										Cogentix Acquires Genesis Medical									
Cogentix Medical, a medical device maker in the urology and gynecology markets, said Wednesday it has acquired the privately held, UK-based Genesis Medical. The company... 











										Diebold Nixdorf Posts Q2 Beat									
Diebold Nixdorf shares were higher 5.4% in pre-market trade after the company reported financial results for Q2, with earnings and revenue that topped analysts’ expectations;... 











										Radius Health Strikes License Deal									
Radius Health, a biopharmaceutical company, said Thursday it has entered into a license and development agreement with Teijin Limited for the commercialization in Japan of... 











										Blackstone Enters Deal to Acquire International Market Centers									
The Blackstone Group L.P said Thursday that funds managed by Blackstone Real Estate Partners and Blackstone Tactical Opportunities have entered into a definitive agreement to... 






Recent Stock News 

						Cardinal Health Tops Fiscal Q4 Street Marks On EPS and Revenues
					By Sarah Galloway | August 02, 2017				


						Cogentix Acquires Genesis Medical
					By Jen Donovan | July 26, 2017				


						Diebold Nixdorf Posts Q2 Beat
					By Sarah Galloway | July 19, 2017				


						Radius Health Strikes License Deal
					By Sarah Galloway | July 13, 2017				


						Blackstone Enters Deal to Acquire International Market Centers
					By Jen Donovan | July 06, 2017				

				View All Recent Stock News ≫
			
 




Stock News

					View More Stock News









									Cardinal Health Tops Fiscal Q4 Street Marks On EPS and Revenues								





                                        August 02, 2017                                    


Cardinal Health, distributor of healthcare products to hospitals, clinics and others, Wednesday reported fiscal Q4 results... 








									Cogentix Acquires Genesis Medical								





                                        July 26, 2017                                    


Cogentix Medical, a medical device maker in the urology and gynecology markets, said Wednesday it has... 








									Diebold Nixdorf Posts Q2 Beat								





                                        July 19, 2017                                    











									Radius Health Strikes License Deal								





                                        July 13, 2017                                    











									Blackstone Enters Deal to Acquire International Market Centers								





                                        July 06, 2017                                    











									Statoil Gets Contract								





                                        June 30, 2017                                    





 

Equities

					View More Equities









									Del Taco Shares Higher								





                                        July 28, 2017                                    


Del Taco Restaurants posted late Thursday Q2 EPS of $0.13, even with last year and in... 








									JinkoSolar Secures Supply Deal								





                                        July 24, 2017                                    


JinkoSolar Holding Company, a provider of solar power products, said Monday that it has supplied 30... 








									Ligand Pharmaceuticals Enters Deal with Amgen								





                                        July 17, 2017                                    











									Cascadian Therapeutics Reports Positive Regulatory Reception At European Medicines Agency								





                                        July 11, 2017                                    











									United Technologies Unit Collaborates With Ophir								





                                        July 05, 2017                                    











									Scientific Games Wins Maryland Lottery Contract								





                                        June 28, 2017                                    





 




 
 



  Latest Articles 

Steven Madden, Ltd. (NasdaqGS:SHOO) Earnings & Valuation in Perspective


KVH Industries, Inc. (NasdaqGS:KVHI): A look at Yield & Technicals


Earnings Yield in Focus For Hasbro, Inc. (NasdaqGS:HAS)


Earnings Yield in Focus For Forbo Holding AG (SWX:FORN)


Quick Look at Shareholder Yield For Nice S.p.A. (BIT:NICE)




Most PopularAccenture to Enable Hess’s Transition to the CloudWabco Posts Mixed Q3 Results; Boosts FY16 EPS Outlook Above Street, Narrows Revenue Guidance Range In Line

 






























Home - NOMURA












This page uses frames, but your browser doesn't support them.







